      "identifier" : [
         "8_05199_539"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Thne Canada Lancet Voi. XLVIII. TORONTO, JULY, 1915 No.1Il EDITORIAL THE CONDITION 0F SERBIA. 'Tis strange, but truc; for truth is always 8trange; atranger tha» fiction,\" said Byron. And the condition of Serbia is deeply miore inter- estlng than fiction. The case o! that Uitile country ia vtery diatressing, and should appeal te ail. She was set upon wîthout cause by Austria. Serbia had offered full reparation for the murder of the Aýrehiuke if it could lie shown that any Serbians were guilty. 'Since the war broke out she lbas suffered ail the horrors of war. Many of her strongeat and bravest have 'been killed, and the country is filled with wounded and alek. In addition to the curse of war, Austria bas given the country thie curse of pestilence; for her arniy contained xnany who were intfeeted with typhus lever. When these became prisoners of 'war they spread th germe broadeast and soldiers and civîlianls have sulfered severely. Thbis condition attracted the attention of a numnber of persons of mneaus and influence, notably Sir Thiomas Lipton and the Ducheas of Talley- rand (Anna Gould). By the efforts of these and the Red Cross, especlally the Anpiean Redj Cross, some much-needed and valuable assistance lias been sent te that country. Of those that have gone several doetors and urses have ajredy auccumbed to typhus lever. Dr. B. M. Cookingham, o! New -Yor State, gives an interesting accc\u003eunt of the conditions found, There are soee 300 doctors for a population o! 3,000,000, or one for every ~oo.These doctors are not at ail] efficient iu anost instances. Dr. Cookingham remarks that ini the village of Valievo the popula- tin a inereased by over 6\u003e000 due to the war. There were fromi Sffl t\u003e 1,000 siek with only himself aud an assistant to do all the work. The had very littie hospital accommodation aud almoat no supplies. rrewere no nurses, and they had to make use of some Austrian pri- ..ners as orderlies. For somie time there 'were 150 deatha daily at Vjeo from typhus fever. This terrible condition was common thogot the country. Dr. Cookinghamn fell ill with typhus and had te lio a miserable make-shift o! a bed; but lie reeovered. (596]",
         "TRI OÂNAD* LÂNOICT. Food is very scarce, and there is urgent need for surgical, supplies aud drugs. The epidemie of typhus Lever ia one of the worat eve known. Dr. Cookingham hopes that ail who eau will render aid. CANADIAN DOCTORS AND NURSES. Already the Canadian doctors and nurses, are heing Lully appre. ciAted. So Lai' they have landed safely at some port of Britain, and have been, assigned to posta of duty, lu connection with the severai Canadian hoapitals that have recently been sent over; or ln connut\u003co with some of the hospitals already in operation. Thci Metagama, earrying No. 3 and 4 General Hospitals, morne 1,Tgoo troops, and 150 nurses, landed at Devonport. The steamer carne in with ail liglits out, and was escorted by five torpedo boat destroyema The nurses were sent on to London aud put up at a Bloomsbury hotel. The troops were sent on to Shorucliffe camp. Some of the nurses wer soon sent over to France, where their services were very urgently re- quired, and wliere tliey are to be temporarily eniptoyed until thelir own hospitals are established. Some werc sent to strengtlieu the staff of the Ducheas of Counaught 's Hospital. As amcn as the various Canadian liospitals, especiaUly thOse frn the univeraities are settled for work excellent resuits are expecteil frorn them. The Canadian doctor aud the Canadian nurse, like the Cana- dian soldfier, lias won higli prai8e lu ai quartera. COL. G. STERLING RYERSON, M.D. Dr. G. S. Ryerson la eutitled to rnuch pralse Lor' his spiendid work iu conuectiou with the Canadian Red Cross wcrk. He had two Bons at the front, aud oue of these was killed at Langernarck, and the other wounded. As the latter was retiriug with others, lie saw bis brohe on the battlefield aud picked hlm np to carry hlm off, wlien he a himselfhbit. ColRyero at te time wasin Britan nuù necio witli the Red Cross work. On heariug the uews cf the death of oue son sud the wounilg of the Cther, Mira. Ryersou salled Lor' England on the Lusitania witha he daughter. -Mrs. Ryeraou loat lier life 'when that steamer was torpetod but the daugliter lu a most miraculous mauner escaped. When the news of the death of one son and the wouuding ofe other had reaelied England, at a meeting oL the B3ritish Red Ci-c Society Prineesa Christian rnoved aud the Marchioneas of La.usd\u003c,w,.",
         "uDrroEIL. sconded, that a resolution of sympathy be sent to Dr. Ryerson, eKpreffl- luxg their heartfelt sorrow for the great Ioss lie had sustained. We join in expressing our deepest syxnpathy for Col. Rtyerson, Truly he bias suffered grievously. is son died bravely on the battie- field, snd bis wife was foully murdered by the crew of a Germia» sub- marine. THE ONTARIO OFFICERS 0F' HEALTI., The fourth annual con! erencee of the Provincial Association of Medical Officers of Healthopened. at the Armnories, Peterboro, on 25th Msfy, with an attendance o! 125. Dr. W. HU Hall, M0.11., Chathamn, proeided. Dr. J. H. Holbrook, superintendent of the Mounttain Sanlit\u0026rium.l Hlamilton, read a paper on \"The Early Signs of Tuberculosis.\" Ife beId that while advanced cases seldoni infected aduits, yet young ehl- drn were subjeet to it. Dr. Craig, superintendent o! Queen Alexandra Sanitarinm, London, spoke on \"Tuberculosis Problems fromn a Health 8tmndpoint.\" It was a diseuse of liousing and living conditions, con- taiuinated bouses being one of the greatest sources of infection. Espe.. e1.1 care was needed to insure Îmmnunity in establishiments where food is prepared or sold. Dr. Hall1, the President, lu bis annual address, spoke o! the reversed conditions of relative liealtlifulness of city and country. Formerly chl- dren were sent to country sehools for liealtli. Now, owing to sanitary advane, the chîidren of eity aschools were heaithier than those o! thé. country, city children having the benefit o! dental attention and nurses, Dr. F. W. Schofield, Toronto, deait with \"Anti-Typhoid Vaccina- tin, particularly exnphasîzing its effectiveness iu military camps, as deosrted lu Toronto. Dr. Hastings, M.0.H., Toronto, spoke o! the difflculty o! educating pulcopinion on sanitation. Rée pointed out the benefits o! it in To- roto where in 1910 the death rate per 100,000 was 40.8, whereas it ba been reduced to 7.5 lu 1914. At the evening session, open to thie public, the Provincial Board o! Selbmoving pietures were presented, and Dr. H. D. Pease, of Lederle Ebrtories, New York, spoke on \"The Rational Position on the Food Dr. C. N. Laurie, o! Port Arthunr, treated the question, - lqw Sa we Enforce Retter Observance o! Quarantine 1\" lu schools, h. Mi, urses were valuable lu preventing concealinent o! contagiolis dis-",
         "THM CÀNA»Â LANCIeT. emes. \"'llealth Problexn8 in SmaIl Towns and Their Solution\" was the subject of the address of Dr. J. W. Shaw, Clinton. Dr. E. B. Oliver, Fort William, deait with \" How Health Officers ean Secure Co-operation of Residents of a Municipality,\" and Dr. M. Powers, Clîinton, in a humerons but practical address deaIt with the subWet, \"Some of the Troubles of the Rural Health Officer and Their Remedy.\" One of the best papers was that of Dr. T. JI MeNally, Guelph Dis- triet Hlealth Officer, on \"'Sanitary Conditions in Rural gSehools. 1 It was extremely practical, and the President, Dr. Hall, of Chatham, andi Dr. Hastings, of Toronto, partieularly congratulated Dr. MeNally. At the closing session the report of the conimittee composed of Dru. W. E. Crain, Chrysler; F. W. Varden, Gait; C. N. Laurie, port Arthur, and E. Bull, Lambton, suggested a schedule of salaries for Mediceal Officers of HTealth: Townships, $800 Per annum; incorportej villages, up to 1,000 popuilation, $150 per annum, with addition of $50 for each 1,000 or majority thereof; towns, $100 for firat 1,000 popula- tien, $50 for each subsequent 1,000; cities under 20,000, $1,000 per year, over this numnber, $1,200. In the discusion leading te the adoption of the report it was pointed eut a desirable as te towns and cities that the. salary should, to insure best resuits, be large enougli to ena.bIe tii. Health Officer te give his whole time te the work. An address by Dr. Adam H. Wright, of Toronto, on \" Abnormal Conditions in Children\" followed. Election of officers resulted as follows: President, Dr. A. W. . Pherson, Peterbero, fermer M.O.H., but now On active service overseua; Vice-President, Dr. A. J. Macauley, Broekville; Secretary-Treaamoe, Dr. J. W. S. MeCullough, Toronto, Provincial Officer ef Health; Oomn- xittee on Papers, Dr. Roberts, Guelph; Dr. F. A. Dales, Stouffville, andi Dr. J. W. S. MeCullough, Toronto. THE TORONTO PREVENTORIUM. Due te the generosity of Col. and Mrs. A. E. Gooderham, the Pre.. ventorium for Ohildren is now in an excellent and efficient condition. This institution, eut cf the cîty on Yenge Street, is their gift. The~ situation is ideal. and has every facility for proper eare, fresh air, andi sunlight. In addition there is an infirxnary, te which patients suffeinig with aiiy form of contagions disease may be removed. This is a mog practical way of dealing with the earliest stage of tuberculosis, or with those children which may only be suspected of having the disease. The, I. 0. D E. have taken a keen interest in the work.",
         "UlDIToRiÂL THE DOCTOR IN THE ARMY. l'le doctor is coming to his own in the armny. In thie first place the planning of the hospital systemn and the Red Cross work have done a vaat amnount for the wounded and sick soldliers. Every effort la made to sectire prompt attention and in this way affords thec best chance ef reeovery. By a thorougli system of sanitatîin d inoculation against typhoid fever this disease has almost disappeared from the arimy. l'heu, again, the use of anti-tetauie seruii is aceomlplishing much. At the earliest moment the wounded, especially those withi dirty and lacerated wounds, are given injections of the anti-tetanie serum. By thiis nicans lockjaw has become almost a thing et the past. Owing to the eare in sanitation and isolation, the diseases spoken of as paratyphoid fevers have become very rare in the armny. Already the army hau learned mueh, if net lu the way of pure science, ut least in the way of appfied science of inedicine. Since tii. Digbtiug la over a highly cultivated, highly fertilized terrain, thiere i,4 great danger of septic infection. In fact, this la more than a danger- there le a great deal of actual infection. 'Science hiad alreadly conquered sepliis, theoretieally, but lu practice it stiil remainied a danger undiier war conditions. In the early stages of the war, when all the Armuy Med(ical Services lu Europe were stili findling their way, there wvere many deaths from sepsia. By observation, by the collection and ex- change of resulta, the Roye*l Army Medical Corps and the. Red Cross have made that problemi no problem at ail. \"Sepsis lias ceased to have, any terrors for us,\" said an emînent surgeon reçeutly. CAMPAIGN AGAINST CANCER. inx the New England States the death rate froin. caxncer la higiier thanin ny her group of States. This is due to the fact that th proportion of old people in greater there than in Cther parts of thxe country. The published returns have stimnulated mucli aetlvlty in inainy qat\"for the control of the~ disease. lui the Ulnited States in the registration ares there were iu 1913 49,928 deaths from this disease. This gives a rate et 78.9 per 100,000 ofthe population. The New England States have a cancer deatx rate muc higher than this. Iu Connecticut it la 85; in Vermiont, Ili: and in Maine, 107. Iu Kentucky it la only 48. The difference la largely deto thxe difference in the average age of thxe people in the severae Without doubt this hîgli death rate cm be materiaily redueed by",
         "TEEL CANADA 11A.NOU. early recognition anid proper treatinent. Cancer is flot always a hope.. leua incurable affection. The main thing to aim at is the education of the people so that they become alert to the early symptoms of the dises.. a.nd seek advice ln turne. It àa held that in this wayv the rate could b. reduced by one-haif or two-thirds. It la with the view of opreading useful information that an organ. ized effort la being made by the medieal profession in many districts in the UJnited States. On the list of those taking a leading part in ihis movement will be found such naines as Drs. Robert Abbé, G. E. Arni- strong,»J. C. Bloodgood, G. E. Brewer, W. W. Chipinan, Il. C. Coe, W. T. Couneilman, T. S, Cuilen, James Ewîng, J. R. Goffe, H{owar~d Lillienthal, F. H. Martin, W. J. Mýayo,\\W. L. Radman, J. H. Wainwrig)t and miany others, together with many proininent lay ladies and gentle- men. Dr. W. S. Braiubridge la talcing a prominent part as a lecturer, MILITARY SIJRGRy. Hlenri Hartinain call (lu Paris Medicalq attention to the unexpect- edly large proportion of wounds due Wo artillery projectiles in the Enropean war; in a serles of cases recently seen no less than 168 wounds had been due Wo artillery, compared Wo ninety-nine caused by rifle but. lets. Under these conditions the treatinent of the wounded bas liad ta differ considerably froin that advlaed by certain authors at the begin- ning of the war, stress being now laid on active preliminary aurgie\u0026I treatment, including dissection of infected tracus, removal of foreiga bodies, and copions irrigation and drainage, as prerequisites lu conserva-. tive surgery, L.e., xi snrgery which avoids complications and seeondary mutilatlug procedures. Tvidence of the prophylactie effieiency of anti. tetanie seruin was obtained lu a series of M11 cases of wounded soldiemg ln whom no tetanus appeared exeept in two instances lu whieh the pre- ventive injection hsd been by error postponed until sit and eight days after admission Wo the hospital. As regards gangrene with gas forma-. tion, Hartmnann points ont the fallacy ot attempting to arrest the pro.e by means of luteratitial injections of hydrogen dioxide solution at the margins of the gas luffltrated tissue; the oiily rational treatment ia t. deal partlcnlarly with the initial focus, removing ail foreigu bodies there, freely separatiug and disinfecting the tissues, and even resorting to amputation where the entire thickness of the 11mb is involved. ila dealing with wounds lu generad, Hartmann pret ers irrigation with hydrogen dioxide solution or one lu twenty phenol solution to the. us of tinctuire of lodine. In badly infected wonnds immersion in antspi fluids or the use ot antiseptic sprays, la recommtnded. Radiosoi examination of ail wounds la adviaed, immediate detection offt rS snd metallie toreign bodies being thua rendered feasible.-New.a York* Medical Jownal.",
         "0RIGflAL CONTRIBUTIONS. ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS TRE NURSE. rAD»IWs TO THE GRADUATING CLASS op NURES\u003efl TUE WJsTERN; 106. PiTAL, ToRoNrro, JUNE 9TH, 1915, ByTHE ITONOUR\u0026BLE WILIM REN0IC RIDDELL, LL.D., Etc., Justice of the Suprenie Court of Ontario. AM net sure why the Board of the Western Hospital have asked me te deliver the Graduation Address to you, but shall flatter myseif by urning that I arn credited with some knowledge of Medicine, Boe \u003ewledge of the world and its ways, and at least a modicum, of com-. ia sens. You are te, be congratulated upen the advanee in publie estimation etofere miade and stili being made by your profession. Searcely hall .ntury lias passeti since the nurse, as we understanti the. name, has orn. an integral and necessary part of English-speaking communi- i.The.hideous picture of the nursing trade--it could not lie dignileti *profession-given by Dickens in Martin Ckuzzl.wit, in the. early ias terrible as it is diagusting anti nauseating-Sairey Gamp andi sy Prig, ignorant, drunken, slatternly, unkempt anti unreliabie--yet re is ne doubt that the. picture, ^vile as it was, wa8 true to nature. kens could and did sec hie as it was andi ceulti and id faithfully rribe what he saw. it is, ini great part, te that splendid woman andi efficient nurse, ronce Nighitingale, that we ewe the profession as it new exists. But te part, and that by ne means negligible, lias been played by the amental revolution in the. m*eal conception ot diseaso itself, Isrgely te the. microscope. The elti physicians looked upon disease alniost as an entity te, b. \u003efeuglit with anti eonquered by the. proper Medicine; the. newer )01 sees but an abnormal condition of the tissues anti ergans of the y, due net seldom te Berne foreign animal or plant which lias madie Pvay where it shoizit not. These physicians endeavour te assiat nature hwew eut the. alien andi tbink ini most cases they de well i rnaking keeping the patient as qualifled as possible in being himsit the, 2c ot bringing about a return et health. VWith these the. nurse is essential;- with those rather a superfluity, a hndane than otherwise. When a tisease was te b. subtinet deo medicine, there a nurse was ef ne use; ah. was rather i wqy than etherwise; but when the body is to b. helpeti te strengthen f b a eoxfortable lied, fresh air, gooti water, apprepriate food, the, y, is different. And se the nurse is cemmng, if net quit. corne, te lier ewn-a con- Mation de-voutly wished anti to lie -wihed.",
         "ME CANADAÂ LLNOrT. Poeta nascituir mmn it-a poet îs born, not made; and s0 it 18 of the nurse. Without the lcnack of nursing, which. cones by nature, if it cones at ail, the nurse cannot attain distinction, but must be to a great extent mediocre, if not a complete faïlure. Granted this knack, this \"!airy god-niotber\" gift of Damne Nature, what then t First, I would say, on the list of qualifications for a succesaful nurse cornes common sense. Carlyle says, \"A thinking man ia the worst enemiy the lrince of Darkness can have\" and heria nearly right-a thinking womnan la a worse. It is 8aid that a reasoning mule will neither Iead nor drive, and if a nurse were something juat to be led or driven that~ apothcgmn would be applicable to, ber; but neither in law nor in ressont le that true of the nurse. She cannot sink ber individuality or abrogate lier dut\u003e' as a niember of the publie and as a reaaoning creature. 1 reniember when at the Bar defending a doctor for maipractice. he was to perforin a serious operation under an an\u0026sthetic and the patient required to be laid on his back on a water licd. The nurs swore at the trial that the doctor had told her to fi11 the bed with boilin~g water. She did fi11 it with boiling water and, of course, the patient b.d bis back shamnefully blistered. The nurse knew the necessar\u003e' resuit of doing as she did, but sad abe thouglit she sbould do exacti\u003e' as she waa told, and without enquiry. She was a foot. If the doctor did give such an order, she sbould have known that it was a slip of the tongue and should have asked about it pointedly. IIad the result been fatal, as it might have been, nothing could have saved hier froni a conviction~ for înanilaughter; ahe could flot have sheltered herseif behind the direction of the doctor; and that the doctor would. be equailly liablé wouid not have saved bier. At tbat trial a surgeon of Toronto, inth front rank of bis profession, swore that if lie eould not rel\u003e' upou his nurse bie mnust give up surgery-tbat anyone calling bierself a nurf. should know that no doctor could intentionally give such an order That nurse did not use lier common sense (asauming that she b.d any\u003e ; she applied to that case the ordinary rule that a doctor's dirctions are to be implicitly followed witbout comment-an excellent ruie, but no always to bie followed. The doctor is not to be contradiited, but every enquir\u003e' is not contradiction. Sometimes it is only knocking at the do u Io sec if intelligence and knowlcdge are at home. Taking the nurseps own story as accurate, the doctor's intelligence was flot at home, but wu away woolgathering. I remember when studying medicine my preceptor once wrote 3 o and gave me the prescription to fill If I had donc so, both of us ol bave seen the prisonier's dock if we got our deserts.",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. Many difficuit, questions have been put-hypothetical questions gen- eruIly, or, at Ieast, the case must be of extremely rare occurrence--as to the duty of a nurse lu administering medicine in dangerous doses, when the doctor is not available to be asked. If that particular doctor is not at hand another probably wiil be, snd, in auy case of real doubt, better follow the advice given by Punch to those about to marry, \"'Don 't.\"* For you may be quite sure that if a niistake îe made, you will ilot be able to clear your skirts by. throwlng everything on the doctor-you are Dmot his slave, but his assistant, sud your negligence is not his. 1 know what I say is opposed Wo the teachings of mnany medlcaj men and nurses, too, but it le law. You have no riglit, much less duty, to Isy amide your common sense. iu what 1 have said I arn not to be considered as suggesting con- gtant or open criticesm of treatment-that às not your function at ail. You must use due care; but the doctor le the final judge as to treatment. yet even here to improve yourself in your art there must ned8b observation, snd therefore criticism, not open, indeed, or to the patient, but te your own mind. \"Criteei Îs like champagne, nothing miore ezecrable if bad, nothing more excellent if good,- says Colton; aud hlu i these days of temperance aud prohibition, wve mnay not aUl agree with hlm as to the excellence of good champagne, there eau b. no doubt of the execrableness of bad criticisra. Good erlticism will assiat in your profession-and to, be a competent eritie you mnuet know. Natural itliece, natural good sense, ie flot enough; neither reading uer writiug comes by nature, nor does a knowledge of nursing. You caunot ku.w tee much, \"a littie knowledge is a dangerous thiug,\" and \"culti- jeýo i as necessary to the nxind as food to the body,\" as Cleero wisely Knowledge has grown front more to more aud ie still growing; old an tlmne-honourcd ideas are gone, newer ones taking their place, lu My school days the future character of Nero was considered to be idi- .cated by hie childhood habit of kMing fles, Everyone will remember in Charles Readc's \"lard Cash\" how the cenduct of David Dodd lu pr,.venting hie mate front killing flics- was held up as a mode]. God's creatures had a rîght to ]ive. \"Rie was killing Ge\u003cl's creatures... 0, y. see, to save their lives, I wasi obliged to throw him overbeard, \" sai David. Now the inaeet has found his true place as the outlaw of retothe Ishmael of the animal kingdom with hie hands against every ma aud every man's hand against him. Emerson said, \" A fly is as utmale as a hyeua, \" but he did net know that it la more dangerous, an Bo lie did not advocate its slaughter. Nowadays with the ringiug, slga Swat the fly 1\" the, boy Neco would be held up as admra\u003eleý",
         "TME CANADA LÂNOWW. and heads gravely shaken at the degeneration sliown Wlien lie grew up-. Hie would ho likened to Domitian, who began su well and ended so badly. More intelligence and more knowledge, Ilwltlout, correspoucllng energy are the polished sword within its scabbard, contemptible if it la nover drown forth. \" The efficient nurse is energetie, she throws off~ langour, dolce far niente; wlth lier, lit e le real, lite is earnest. eue la diligent, and diligence includes most of the virtues. She throws lier- self into lier profession and loves it and lives it. She does the duty wbich lies nearest to lier and fears not that bidden to wait it niay return -with seven freali duties at its back.\" Site follows the advicc of Pythagoras te \"choose always te way whicli seema to bo the best, however rougli it may ho, well knowing that custom will render it easy and agreeable\"-that custoin la Second nature, that \"doing la te great thing, for if people resolutely do what la riglit they corne lu time to like it,\" as John Ruskin assures u*-that \"duty by habit la to pleasure turned.\" Enthuaiasm is a great thing, but ît rnay go toc fa.r; noarly as mnay suifer from too mucli as toc httle. \u003c'Meden agan,\u003e' lu uothing too muoh, was the Green maxim. Eutliusiasm must be texnpered by reason and so become earnestness, for we know that even those of the mont dia- tinguished talents are not necessarily gifted wit discretion; andi while, one of large intelligence generally knows a great deal, he lu not there- fore always prudent. Courage, too, le needed. \" Courage, uir, that makes man or woman look their goodliest,\" says thte late Poet Liaureate. Titere la no roorn lu the nursing profession for one who leses her head lu an emergzLcy, and who le afraid te take on responsibility wlicu occasion calis for iV; but this does flot mean or imply running unnecessary danger, danger for danger's sake la senselesa folly andi cannot be too, severely reprobatej_ T)oing nothing is net necessarily doing ill. Thero la sudit a thing as disciplined inaction, and tliey also serve who only stand aud wait. Shakespeare its: A merry lieart goes ail the day, Your said tires in a mile a The Good Bock pute 1V botter thus: \" A meriry heart does good Iike a medicine\"; Addison says: \"Cheerfulness la the bout promoter of helt andtis as friendly Vo, te mind as te thte body\"; andi Jean ?Paul, \" Chee fùlness la the heaven under whileh everything thrlves but poison.,\" Many patients have grown. well under the cOmPelling influne of te citoorful nurse, te wliem a broken spirit would have driei te boes and te tell cf oue's physical affictions to a sympatitetic and hei ru nurse la itself an alleviation as elti Oviti well kuew in lis day. Weh-Y",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTTIONS. rery man le a rascal as soon as he ia siek, as Dr. Johineon thought-and ý na mach of the time sick MIxnself and should know-there ie no \u003eubt that every man is an egotiet as soon and as long as lie le aick; the ise nuree weli knows how mach and how little to pander wo this ab-~ )rmal egoliin and how much to, discourage miournfal forebodings and encourage optimism. 1 know many lecturers adviae against talking ith a patient about his ailments at ail; it tende, they thiùk, to make ni too introspective, morbid, pessimistie, and eo it may, if lie taiks to fool; not, I think, where the nurse je intelligent, ekilled, earnet- jeu seul devine les sots. But you shoiild be secret as the grave to others. The patient's crts are his own and to be shared only by the doctor, the nurse and [ose to vhom, le approves. Do net allow youreelf to become vulgarized. You are a nurse, you iould not cease to be a lady. Many things you sec, many things you ust sometimiee epeak of ln your profession wili have a tendency wo ,mtalize the nxind. Guard againet that, a woman once vulgarized eau \u003ever be rehabilitated, ehe le vulgar and no longer a lady-the uniformn Ma nurse should cover a clean mmid and a pure heart as it covers a ean body. To be a perfect nurse you must be perfectly healthy. You Rhould )t b. liable tothe Iaeh of the Roman satirist, \"Alirum m.dicus, ips. ý,erius scates,\" \"yoa who would f ain cure oth ers, yourmelf overfloving ith iseses\" \"Take care that you keep well,\" maya Cicero, advice good to-day as it was two thousand years \u0026go. \"Der Mensch îst, w\"s er it,\" man je wliat lie eats, maya the \u003clerman -overb. What to eat, hewmuch to etisin great measure anater experience utilized by- commen sense. 1 have recently had occasion tw snethe evolution of dieteties fromn the time of Charles IL., and the ai tread running through the procese le the gradual elimination of limal flesh in excess. I am not a vegetarlan in general; moreover, ,w raw fruits agree wlth me, bat I lose my guess if the process db\u003ees \u003et proceed further, and if at leaat for sedentary or senil-sedentary ,cuatinsthe day of mach meat is not donc. W. are ereatures of habit and are vont wo eat what. and what nnt, w are accustomed to eat, but food to uss l 1ke fuel iii a Mng.If a skilf ai furuace-man keep up the accustomed heat or any ffcetheat it does not matter how murli or what kind of eal h~e s ( long as it doee not eoet tee mucli). 8\u003c\u003e with food-if yon find atls keeps the body in vigour, yen viii be slUy if yen do not ,tls; if les meat, you find, makes yen more hea1tlhy, take less ineat ýi \u003eaJI suh matters use your common mense.",
         "TEZ CANADA LA»nCr. Those who should know, tell us that the use of a diet iargcly, if not exclusively vegetable, will dcstroy rheumatisma (which many Bay d\u0026cs fot exiat. anyway-iike Sairey Gamp's Mrm. Harris, \"thore 18 no0 sucli person\") gout (which they admit with Borne reserve) and neurii (which everyone knows) perhaposo5; \"fiat experimenttêm in\u0026 corporo proprio,\", Le. try it. The drunken old nurse--she who had the hottie of gin placed on the mantel so she could put her lips to it when s0 dîsposed-is dead, and kas no successor; wîthout being a prohibitionist, or even a temperance man, the average patient wouid, if there must ho a smell, prefer that of the harmias mephitis Americana to that of liquor on the breath of his nurse. Wîne makcth glad the heart of maxi oven yet, as it did li the. Psalmist's days, but not when it gets no0 nearer hlm than the nurse- it cloos its joymaking work oniy at flrst-hand. Speakixig of myseif only, I could neyer sec and cannot sec, why, if men use tobacco, women may not. The cuatom is growing i sme circles snd 'will probably continue to grow. But 1 have heard rnany delicate womcen complain of the sîneil of setl tobaco, on the clothes of the doctor; and 1 amn quite sure that inoat women, and mnen,too, would prefer the ameil of assfoetida on a nurse 's uniforma to that of tobaceo. The one miglit ho medicinal or accidentai, the other couid flot be. lI dress the nurse, like the soldier, when, on duty, is relieved of allcare of her outside clothing. The uxiiform of the nurse in its neatns la as far removed fromn finicainess as from slovenliness, is as honourable and should be «worxi as proudly as that of His Majesty's troops. 8h. is engagod, in as necessary and as iofty a work as are our splendid lads in the trenches i Planders, and should bo as proud as they. A writcr li the Ânglo-Âmerican Magazine, published in Torot, lxi the number for May, 1853, gives an appalling pieture of the eo a Hospital of that day. (Sec my article, \"Ezamination for License t. P'ractice Sixty Years Ago, \" Canada Lancet, June, 1913). Hecal it an oid pest house, its surgery with seeves of mnusty-4ooking old bot-. tics covered with dust anid eobwebs, its operatlig room a darc close room , \"a sort of Caleutta Black ile. \" We need net ho told that the, mortaiity li that ehamber of horrors was frlghtful. Now we know that dust may ho as daxigorous as arsenic, axid tlhat sunlight le often itself a medicixie. The nurse is ealled upon te shi.kd the patient from dlrt, dust, flics, darkness, as formerly she kept ber charge from liglit, fresh air (and especlally nilght air), and ofton frs water. lJtter cleanlinesa must ho considered as natural and essontial s breathixig; frcsh air as food. lIn an interesting aud ainusing book published in 1800, \"The Hos-",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS, al Student,\" by James Parkinson, a surgeon of some note and a eontologist flot quite forgotten, he speaks (p. 26)) of \"thie vulgar ý. common) observation, that a physician seldom obtains bread by haB ifession, untl lie bas no teetli left te eat it\"; and lie adds, \"I1 hav6 self known a physician above fifty years of age objected to for hia Matters are not quite so bail in this age and country, but stili the mng physician le not considered to be entitled te charge quite se mucli the old and experienced-much less is the young surgeon expected receive se xnuch as the leaders ln the profession. So, too, the young yer just starting cannot charge a counsel f ee whicli the noted K.O. ild expect as of course. In your profession, however ,the recent graduate expeets to receive Idoes receive the same fee as the more experleneed. Sometimes that !xp1alned by the suggestion that the science and art of nursing is 'ancing and the latest graduate has the latest improvements. Per- ,s se, but as the Germans say, \"Change and betterment are different Igi,\"1 and ln any event, the same argument should apply to the youmg geon. I may be permitted to doubt that in either profession the extra ncee and knowledge can take the place of the extra knack and dex- ty acquired and acquirable only by experience. Experience is the L teacher, even if the sehool fees are high. The real reason for this equality of nurses' fees lies deeper. A ,ician sliould be as good at sîxt;y as at thirty, or better-a lawyer * not loe by advancing years, and until lie becomes practically help- h is practice generally increases; but a nurse lias net more than -en or twenty years of'really efflcient and remunerative servicee, must make hay wbile the sun shines and cannot wait tubl october Io it either. True, the nurse is still a woman. Most of yoii are destined for the r march down the long aisie te the favorite air from Lohengrin, but .e are exceptions. Sonie are born old maids, some achieve old maid- ci, and some have old maidliood thrust upon them; and it requires peaiably genereus pay, and careful and economical management for une to make enough. during lier years of active service to support ln atter life. And that brings me back to a most impertant-.some wonid say- most important matter. Many have flot yet get rid of the idea that uruo la a klnd of Sister of Charity; that she ouglit t\u003e attend a :person for nothing, if necessary; aud in aiy eveut for what the ient ean afford. The other day 1 read an addresa frem a very prom- it miedical maan te a graduating clans of nurses, in 'which lie advised",
         "TME CANADA LANCET. them to, take wliat are called \"pooicases\" clieerfulty, Now it is asy for a doctor to give that advice--wleni he attends the poor, it takes up but a small part o! his time and lie eau make it up witli his pay-ing patients. The. lawyer advising thé poor and imnpecunious, need not thorefore close his office to, the welI-to-do. Lt is te the credit o! both professions that their inembers do give an enormous amnount o! atten- tien and assistance te, those who caunot pay; but their tim, is never wholly taken up with sucli,tliey are flot prevented fromn making money out of others. As regards the. clergyman, visiting tiie pooe, la part of his work for whieh lie is paid. If the nurse take a poor patient, she cannot take a rich, lier time is wholly taken up with the. one-and if shis~l net paîd, lier short tern ,o! productive service is by so mucli shortened. Moreover, while a doc-~ tor or a lawyer do.. not lose caste, but ratiier the. reverse, by iiêlping the peor, the nurse does. A nurse m'ho acquires the reputatien o! b.lng ,a clieap nurse will be lield cheap. Now God forbid that I should say anything te, clieck a gnru impulse or te prevent kindly gratuitous service; but let it b. con8idered. as it ie, a cliarity. No ene may b. requlred to do, as no one may b. restrained f rom doiug, a charitable act, sud be sure there la nothin\u003c in your professienal ethies which calla on you te give your servie. for nothing or for less than yen eau obtain. A farmer mniglit juet as weil b. required to give a load o! pets.toes or wlieat. The. estiniate you put ou yourselves will b. the estimate the. people will put upon you. Rbert Burns kuew thie world well when lie advised a young friend tha: \"Gatiier year by every wile Tiiat's justill'd by lienour; Not for te hide it iu a liedge, Nor for a train attendant; But for the glorious privilege 0f being independet\" Nor need yen fear want of einployment if yen are the riglit sort. Emr -son asks, \"Can anybody remember wli the. riglit sort o! men and th riglit sort o! weinen were plentiful?\" Anycue witli any __ereceo reading would readily answer in the negative. Nor need you te, cringe for employment or te lie too humibly . mizant o! favour on obtaining it-the labourer is wertliy of his hir and yen will give 100 cents' wortli for every dollar you receive. But once empleyed, ail thouglit ef self sud self aggranieet mnust cease, mnorbid fear o! depreciation or want o! apprciat\u003c\u003en, ap preliensien that you will not receive proper respect or your rgtu aceial position, afl that sud the. like, muet be rel.gated te, the bck",
         "ORJIIAL 0OONTRIBJTIONS. round; the patient first, the patient st, always. the. patient being yeur tre alt else torgotten. Esprit de corps, valuiabte as it ia; pursuit of mewledge, laudable as it is; pursuit of pleasure, excusabl, as it la, are 1 as the amat dust ot the balance, compared te the. reat objeet of the. aue 's lite, te heal the sick. I wlih the graduating clama of 1915 ot tiie Western Hospital ail jcces and ail happiness lin their ehosen lite; t arn confident that the. pbt which everyonie owes te his profession will b. paiti by tiiem in fuit, id that the, nursing profession will net suifer in public opinion or in roficiency trom them. ADDRE8S ON SUROERY.' 1h FRÂNqCIS J. SHEPIEIRD, M.D., LL.D., F.R.-. T ei oe et the privieges ot age te b. reminua\u003cient, andi mhen asked t4e Vive thia address I thought it would b. interesting te look back andi eswhat changes have taken place in the science andi art et surgery sýince entered as a medical student iu the. tati ef 1869. It ia well for the present generation et surgeons te be aware ef the piition ef affaira in the, pre-antiseptie tisys snd te have sorne concqp- )nj ef the. dangers andi diffilulties et surgery at tuat time. What la »y te the. present generatien was a source et diftlculty them, and i t la cil to know that surgery was not berri thoroughly equipped am wa iperva the Gotidess ot Wisdemn and Wars, Art. andi Sciene. when e sPrung full grown and comptetely armeti trom the. brain of Jupiter. The. efllciency et surger-y has been arriveti at by a slow proce.. ot olto.Ther. had been but littie ativance lu surgery for aume titne fre 1 entered medicine. Lister was juat being heard et in Glasgew appiyig Pasteur's gerrn theory te anrgery sud trying te finti soie bstnee wiiich would destroy the. organisin h. was convincedj were the. us o\u003ef sepuis and suppuration. %ut the. gerin tiieory wa3 net yet ntedby surgeons lu general andi especially were the. London sur- ow oposedte it andi even matie fun of Liater's anticeptie effort. I remember my first experience et aurgical responsiiliity was sit- g a night after an amputation et the thigh se as te b. present ( aply a tourniquet in case et seendary hmorhiage. At that timue ]yone end et the. silk legatures was eut short, the. other iianging out oe rner ef the. flap, cheifly, they saiti, fer drainage. During mny ,etdas it was rare te have an a~mputation of the. thigh live until Bedbefore the. Ontario MedJ1eal Asociation, May 27th, 1915.",
         "TME CANADA LÂWNI'T. the ligature carne away on the l4th day, they usually died of sliock Or pyexnia the. first week; 1 do flot tbink 1 ever saw au amputation oft the. thigh higii up recver. Surgical operations then consisted ebiefly of removal of exteriial tumors, amputations for injury or disease, cutting for atone aud open. ing obacesses. The. abdomen was a marce datsum, aud if by accident the peritoneal cavity was epened the. fate of that patient was sealed and the church wau bis only salvation. Stiil the surgeons of that day were moet ûkilled operators as they hadl learu.d their business iu pre-anetei timon, and it wus a common thing to see an amputation of thie leg or tiiigh doue in sizty seconds, and a complet. lateral lithotomny undea. two, minutes. I remember Sir William Fergusen, of Kiug's CelI.ge Hospital, London, operating in a dress suit with mucii expause of shirt front and cuifs aud being so ean an operator that he prided himslf on xieyer gettiug a drop of blood ou bis white shirt. Most operators used su old frock coat whieh was neyer eleaed and so was sosked in the. g\u003c\u003ere of msny victims. Some washed their bauds, others did not. the field of operation was rarely cleansed except the. wound caused by injury was full of dirt. Ail compound fractures of the, leg were amPutat.d at once se as to avoid certain death from sepsis, the only excepting wns when the. bon. bad made a punctured wound, the. wouud would b. clesed by cougealed blood and healed iu that way under dlot. In my iast year of studentslip Professor Wm. Fraser, who had spent the. summer iu England, intredueed Lister'. metiiod of opening abcse under lint soaloed iu canbolie acid. At this time there was no sucb thing as traiued nursing, anyv old persen was employed h tbougbt they had a gift that way, aud did their best; rnany of hi imbibed, for at that tume every patient was given an alle'wance of beer, whiskey, or port wiue daily, aud the. uight nurses especially were aeldo. sober. 1Iremember ithe seventies pay iugavteapatitnth 'hospital on whom 1 had that xnorning operated for strangulated hena 1 could net id the. nurse at ail (she supervised tbree flats), but mny patient 1 found sitting eut on the, veranda in lu is nighv.shirt smokig a pipe, aud ail the. obstreperous or delîrous patients strapped te thùr beds. It wss a cool eveuing lu the. autumn sud my patient died pneuiuenia seuxe day. after-wards. 1 do not want to ixply tbstwe hadno succse, for 1hae seen very many brilliant successful litiiotomies, removal of tumrner sud am- putations, sud I bave even seen bealixig by first intention. But it Wu strange that eue of our surgeons, a very skilful eperator, but *ho aftor operating visited bis patients but seldoni, bad better resulta than hi colleague, a mueh more conscientieus man, wbe aiso was fend of Dah",
         "ORIGINAL CONTROBUMjNg* *ogy and liked to see the post-mortems on his patients and fussed al iod dleal over his cases. Neediess to say the latter 's rstawere not ,markably good. We knew nothing about gerins at tnat lime and thought that putre- Letion was eaused by the oxygen of the air. When Pasteur demnon- rated that putrefaction was caused by microbes, Lister by his previous ork, from his student days onder Sharpey, was prepared to welconie19 [i8 discovery and he says in his Third Huxley Lectore: 'Thuas was .*esented a new problein; flot to exelude oxygen fromn wounds, which us impossible, but to proteet them from the living causes of jecom- \u003esition by means which should distnrb t'ho tissnes as littie as is con- gtent with the attainment of the essential objeit.\" Since then it has en proved that putrefaction is flot the only cause of serions misehief wounds, for there are microbes which are odorle\u0026s and yet produve lofound 8eptiC effect8. .At this period and for soîne time after it was a comminon thiug for e operating rooin orderly to be also orderly in the post-mortemn roorn. ance the better results of operations performed in the country or pri. te bouses than those performed in hospitals. When I visited London 1873 1 found the resulte of the surgeons fairly good, in fact London d English snrgery was always clean and the resuits excellent for that riod, and this is one of the reasons why antiseptic surgery made stich \u003ew progress in London. Whist in Germany the surgery of that time w very dirty and neither personal cleanliness nor the cleanlineas of spitals a. istinguishing feature, the resuîts were aceordingly bad, nee Listerism was adopted with avidity and the change to antiseptic rgery revolutÎonized the German inethods with such amiazing improve- !,ut in the death rate that woon they out-Listered Lister. When 1 wus in Vienna in 1874-5 antisepties had 'lot yet been intro- ced and surgical mortality was tremendous. 1 neyer aaw an opera- n for strangulated hernia recover and sepsis prevailed everYwhere, ,u the great Billroth had often disastrons resuits; twelve years later ,e 1 visited Europe again what a change had taken place! Ho.. .Ris snd operators, dean to excess; operations neyer hitherto attemnpted rformed successfully, a very low surgical mortality, and surgery in- fing every region of the body and annexing territory which formnerly g thought to be the exclusive doulain of the physicians. in 1874 1 visited Edinbnrgh to seS Professor Lister's work and a eBt im~pression it made upon me. John Chiene 'was then bis house geon and if I renmember aright he mianipnlated the hand spray of ,boUce solution whieh was used during the operating and dressings. lat struck me most was the exessve care of Lister in bis dressings,",
         "Tin CANADA LANCWET. the great attention to detail and cleanliness; and in operating, his greet deliberation. The spray wau used on the supposition that most of the germs which înfected wounds came from the atmospheric dust;. when Lister found that the atmosphere, was comparatively harmless and that the organismne were on the skin of the patients and the hands and impie. ments of the operator he abandoned the spray. As many of you mey remember, the hand spray was replaced by a stearn spray. In Germany this was furnished by a large hoîler placed in an adjoining room whieh poured forth carbolie aeid spray into, the operating romr and covered everybody with a thick Scotch xuist; in tact, one could scarceiy sec acrom the room and to preteet oneseif waterproof clothing bail to be worn, This, of course, wag German excesa. Later von Bruns led a crusade againet the spray and \"fort mit dem spray \" was the cry and soon thie spray was replaced in Germany by irrigation. Niagaras of water were poured over the patient and the field of eperation, S(\u003e rnch se that the. floors were flooded and the onlookers had te get on chairs whilst the, operator and his assistants waded through the flood inx long rubber boots. Soon irrigation became ont of fashion and aseptic and dry dren.. ings were adopted which in ordinary surgery are uftd te the pre.eut day. In military surgery asepticism is impossible aud resort is one more being had te antiseptice with the best resuits. The scope of surgery in comparison to what it was torty years ago is enormous--no cavity of the body is now shunned by the surgeon: lied such advanes beu prophesied in the middle of st century the luinetie asylum wonld have beau thought a lit place for the. prophet. As 1 have said before, one of the great troubles after amputation wMs secondary hemorrhage-one saw hangig out of oe corner ef the stunip a number of waxed linen or silk threads; some were on smail vesseh others on large, and the surgeon mnaking his rounds looked et the stutup and pnlled at eue or Cther et these threads te see if they had ulceraed~ sjufflciently te corne away 1 Very often with the ligature came a gneih ef blood. This secondary hemorr-hage reqnired the reopening of th stump and the vessaI securad, no easy mattar with the instruments tieui in use aud in a suppuratiug granulation surface. Sir James Y. Simp- son, te do away with ligatures aud their dangers, introdued whet he callad acupressure, a mathod te comprass artaries by niasus of metallie needies introduced ini varions ways. At the same time Lister begen te cnt both ends of bis ligatures short and leave themi te thair fate burie4 ini tha tissues; this -waq before ha intredaced absorbable ligatures of cutgnt. Although geed rasults were obtained from acupressure, and many cages ef healing by first intention wera reperted, yet Listerb",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTTIONS. igatures won the day and soon Simpson's method passeti away and is, ýow quite forgotten. Abdominal operations are now as sale as any other major cases and( ur knowledge of germa, how to control their evil effects and( toprvn bheir invasion, makes most operations in surgery eoînparatively withiout luch risk. Appendicitis, or inflammation of thec bowels as it watt calleti, ras thought to be a rare disease and wau flot con4idereti at ail sujrgicýal. ~lhe common medical term was typhlitis, witb peri-or para-as atdi-i [onjs. It was thouglit to commence in the eelluilar ti,,sn around flic ecum or typhlus, or ceeus. In a short timeit our, greater knowledgeK o)f athology properly placed the blame on the appendix. Operationa er ie rarely performed, except for peri-typhlitic abes t, firsf opera. ons were neyer undertaken unless puss was foujnd by flc exploring sedie, and the search for the appenix was always a mlatter of difficulty. lie first twelve cases I operated on ail died, because 1 wa4 onlly ralleti 1 to operate when the physician thouglit lie could do no mort; thenIfI t hk, iygeon was the dernier ressort. At this time diagnosis was flo(t eas Id appendicîtis was often mistaken for typhoiti. It seemas absurd now i know with what difflculty physicians and surgeons diagnosed thia ýwase and then only affer many anxious a.nd serious consultatios. hil.t now every man and child in the street coulti make a diaguosis ,om a verbal description of the case. But so if is, and what is diffienît, id obscure in one generafion oftcn becomes simple and cle.ar in the It is strange to look back and sec flie graduai growth of ablomiinlal irgery - at first the only operation on the abdomen was an obligm±ory Le, ViZ., for strangulated liera, and fuis was donc with serious fore- idings. Soon operations were pcrformed for ovarian tumors and 'aries without tumora, and soccessiully carricti ouf by bawson Tait. )gencer Wells, Keifli, and others. In fact, we are indebteti largely tg mLwsoei Tait for lus pioncer work in abdominal and especially pelvie rgery. Ovariofomies, since MacDowvell 's fainons case, were performnet DU finie fo finie with occasional success, but whcn I studied in London ery case I saw operafeti on provcd fatal. With our knowledge of the rw theory and with the introduction of Lisferjsmn thie obstacles wo covery were removed and ovarîotoxny becane a comnion and safte eri\u003en Surgeons rapidly adoptcd Lisferism and \" boonied \" it, andi a short finie were doing ail flic operafions hitherto only suiggesteýi eh as excision of the stomacli, intestines, kidney, spleen, et cetera. .Opeat houses Gernian hospitals becanie sanitariums, and as thec nce of Àugut l3th, 1881, observed at flic time -'our admiration for C chanuge effectcd is only equalleid by our horror of previous condi-",
         "TUE CANADA LANCE?. tions.\"1 Many Gernnan surgeons advocated the conipulsory uise of anti- septice, and Professr Naussbaum, in 1881, suggested the following law: \"'Any person summoned to, heal an accidentai case or wound, inust ne0 longer close ît up with an adhesive plaster, nor examine or disturb it with a linger which bas not been disinfected; but after the surgeon lias washed his hands and the wound with some disinfectant (for whieh purpose a five per cent. solution of carbolie acid seenis to be the Most ,convenient), the wound miust be thoroughly proteeted with an alutiseptie dressing. Such dressing înay eonsist of carboizd jute or wadding, ehloride of zine wadding, or some other well-known antiseptie mnaterial.\" Simnon first rernoved the kidney designedly in 1869. In 1881 an oecasional excision of the kidney is reported, and papers were read on the subject at the International Medical Congress in London in 1881. I think it was Mr. Hienry Morris who tinat successfully removed a Stone from the kidney where there was no suppuration (in 1880). I first excised a kidney suecessfutlly in 1884 and a stone in 1886. MY first gal 1- stone operation was in 1890. It îa interesting to look back on the past iterature and to study the conditions of surgery at that time. In 1888 1 gave the surgieal addres before the Canadian Medfical Association in Ottawa and spoke among other things of the surgery of the abdomen, and the information given below îs extraeted froin that address: \"It waa strongly adviseýd that ail cases of intestinal obstruction be handed over te the surgeon and net kept on medical treatmeut by the physician until it waa too late to operate.\" Surgical treatment was recommended in ail caes of suppura- tive appendicitis and a few advanced surgeons advocated early opera- tiona. Typhoidý perforations were being occasonally operated upon, always with fatal results. It was found out accidentally when oper- ating for tumor in a mistaken diagnosis that tubercular peritonitis eould be eured by opemîng the peritoneal cavity. Perforating gunshot weunds of the obdomen were being îmmediately operated upon. Radical cure of hernia was beeoxning a safe and fashionable operation. The aurgery of the gaîl bladder was looniing Up as an accepted and successful fact. Lawson Tait reported thirty cases of cholecystostomny with one death. Crede, of Dresden, had had only five cases with one death, and Langen. buch, of Berlin, had colleeted 75 cases of cholecystostomy with two relapses, il deaths, and 16 caues with fistula resulting. He advised against operation when the atones were in the common duct. O Cecasionally case of operations on the stomach, intestines, Spleen and panereas were reported, but with f ew successes. The operations or nephreetomy and nephro-lithotomy had become well established. In 1888 prostatie, surgery was yet in its fatal infanicy, though tumors of",
         "ORIGINAL OONTRIBUTIONB. the. bladder were being operated on. In other departmnents of surgery, thie brain and spinal cord were fields of operation just beeomning known through the work of Victor Horsley, Keen, ýMaeewen. Weir and others. Surgery is stili advancing aud is enlisting mnore votaries than ever, nearly every new graduate wishes to becomne a surgeon. Every* saat place has now a well-eqoipped hospital witii excellent faceilities and every opportunity is offered for the proseeution of the art of surgery. I arn afraid there is often more art than science and mnuch nniieessary operating because now most operations are, corinparativelyl safe. Theýrt, is somnething more than mere mechanical ski][ neededj by- surgeons. lt.e mgt important attribute8. of a surgeon are juidgnit a.ndknweg when Wo operate and when not to operate and whieu to itop-til(haial.i kuowledge of surgery cau neyer teach this. 1 remiember sotie years ago vi.iting a amati towu west of Montreal and( operating iii a eI~eup ittie hospital and afterwards was ahown no less than four cases of extirpation of tbe uterus operated on by four different surgeons, ail 1 \u0026Iu happy te say convalescing (the patients, flot the surgeons). Wh.lit ,anazedj me wau that there should be snch a rieess.ity* for 80 mnany opera- tions in so amail a place. ln our own large bospitals inlu otr.l I hall never aMM SO many cases together iu the gynectologicat warda, 1 rernember hearing of another cas where a good surgeon iu a large city Of the United States operated for appendicitis oni the only child of a ypry prominent family. After removiing the appeudix, ais the ccam, or what they thought was the cecum, was fuît of feces, it was opened ,an the feces evacuated and then the wound was closed. A fe-w days Rater a fecat fistula appeared which would not close. Thie boy'. condi- tion from the continuons drain and irritation becamie bad and ai, aln- t\u003ej»osis operation was advised and doue. Still the fistula eontinued 811d he grew rapîdly worse. Hie waa brought Wo Phutadeiphia anud a proiiin- en surgeon was consultai, who totd me thie tale. An explorâtory in- eision was made, but uothiug coutd be doue as there w., so macih aggtu- tinzation of thie intestines and the boysa condition so serious. At post-. m\u003cirtem it was found that the appendix was still lu situ aud had never been remnoved. It was the upper part of the ileum aud not thie eeecam fro\u003c\u003ei whieh the feces had been evaeuated aud which was ltatutloua, but th anastomosis of the ileum wÎth the coton had been a perfect sueceu. linc you see here a well markcd cse of teehuicat skili without know- jedge. 1 eould relate many analogous cases, but refrain. As long ago as 1887 Professor Bergmnanu, at thie Qerman Seientifiv h.dcal Association, spokre the following impressive pregilant word.a whieh are applicable even to-day. lie said: \"There i. miore or la riar between medicine and SUrgery lu thie case of disease but fuirthe(r",
         "TEM CANAD* LANCWI. progress in surgery ean, çnly take place through an increased, knowledge of internai medicine. Surgeons must now avail thernselves more of the aceurate means of investigation which one owes to physicians, ausculta- tion and percussion, thermoxnetry, chernical, nicro\u0026scopiCal and eleetrical investigations. As long as internai medicine remakes guardian of scie»- tifle medicine and scientil principles, so long will it remain the parent tree of whch surgery is only the brandiL. . . It follows from what bas been said that surgery owes ail its recent development to elinical medicine and just as antisepte treatment is the product of careful observation in etiology 80 the energetic procedures of internai surgery will have successful resuits only when firmiy established by the methods of elinieal medicine; otherwise surgery will sink in the bande of expert specialistis to a mere dîsplay of manual dexterity.\"1 Surgeons won» feit that they could not be good interniats and have a competent knowledge of ail branches of surgery, so this has led to tea. ,work i private and publie hospitals whieh makes for auch efficieney snd enables the surgeons te do an enormons ainount of work. This metliod, liowever, is apt to, make the surgeon a mere operating machine and may not work out for tlie entire good of the profession. lit is better for a surgical department to have a head who lias gone tlirough ail the. stages of inedicine including a sound course iii patliology and patho. logical chemistry and who lias a good training in clinicai medicine. of course, bis department in equipped with a staff of specialiats ini path- ology and cheistry, but lie himself sliould be the guidiug hand aiid euggest and direct the work to be donc. lIt goe wÎthout saYing tli\u0026t evcry one wlio practises in the country muet do some surgery, but lie should net attempt it without, laving had, some lispital training as a surgical interne after graduation. The tendeney of thie Youulger sur. geons is to look upon thie eider men as liaving lsid no proper training; theY eall us pre-scientffie and seem to think that laboratory methods are evcrytliing. I remember a patliologist giving a lecture to the incoming students in a miedical sdhool, and lie told tliem that laboratory methods bail supplanted ail otliers, including experience, whieli the eider men prided themacîves upon. I lad liappened to lhave liad some ten day, before a serious gunsbot wonnd of the a=m in a boy wlere the brachial arterY and biceps muscle and some of the nerve liad been sliot away, wliere, in fact, tlie whole arma was sliattered. He lad pulled the gix» to lire by thie barrel wlen it went off. Tlie wliole ferearm was wax-. like, bloodîcas, cold and absolutcly no circulation existed. 1 was ad- vised to amputate immediately, by a colleague, but refrained, and after treating and dressing the wounded arm, wrapped the extrcinity in layers of cotton wool. In 24 hours there was a sligît flushi ini the fiuieg",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. and in three days the lirnb was warxu and afterwards theý case mtent Ml well. Now 1 asked xuy friend, the lecturer, how he vouldi te.l vy anly laboratory rnethod, whether to amputate or wait. 0f course, he could, give no answer, and no doubt he thought he was quite right. but lie bad neyer praetised surgery and had neyer been up against a case whieih required judgnwnt and experience, and yet he was quite willing to speak, ex cathedra to men who were going to practise inedicine and surgvrv. 1 rnay say the boy alluded to lias a moat useful riglit arin, with mich lie can play a good game of tennis. As the Psalrnist ways, - 1 ain wiser than the aged,\" 80 say the younger men of every generation, but re- inember what Huxley says: \"We are none of us infallible, not eveni the youngest.\" 1 admit as we get older we becorne more conservative, and perhaps procrastinate, but this is the infallible result of long experi. .1100. How rnany xnethods bave we older men seen corne and go, laudedl to the skies by cloquent advocates, both in societies and journals; we often hear of remedies and rnethods by which every case isecured and dozens who have made use of thein print undigested articles confirniing the originator's views anid irnproving on thein; sonie would find theni only suitable on seleeted cases, and finally this remedy or mnethod is forgotten beause it is of no value and could not stand the test of experience. Ast Byron said in bis poem, \"English Bards and Scotch Reviewers\": \"Thus saith the Preacher:- 'Nauglit beneath the suD is new, What varied wonders tempt us as they pass? The cow-pox, tractors, galvaniin, gas, In turne appear to make the vulgar stare Till the swoll 'n bubble bursts and ail is air?\"' Aitbough I arn as much an advocate of laboratory methods as thie inlost oejentiflc youmger surgeon$ yet thcy should flot replace those powers of obsjervation which are the great asset of the medieal niar. 1 fear it is teu\u003cùng to do so, for the recent graduate dares not diagnose a fracture without X-rays, a typhoid fever with a Widal, syphilis without a Was- german, and no on. We cannot always carry a Iaboratory or hospital appliance about with us, so wc should not depend too mnuci on the us of mnechanical ineans in diagnosing disease, and should not let our powers of observation atrophy. Time, no doubt, wiIl remedy this state of affairaî and things will bear their proper proportion to one'another. Sorne are -very sceptical that titis will occur and think there is nothing truc or sure but rnutability. As Moo-re says:- \"VTe world is ail a fleeting show, For man's illusion given; VTe smiles of joy, the tears of woe, Dceitful shine, deceitful flow, There 's nothing truc but Hleaven.\"1",
         "TIM CANADA LAXcrT. For the sake of the wounded in the present awful war, it is fortun- ate that surgery has attained sucb a high piteh of efflcieney and that hospitals are now so well arranged and managed. What a controat to that which existed ini the Crimean War, when Florence Nightingale dlid an mueli to clean out the Augean Stables whose doors were elosed with red tape. Now froîn the field bo the base hospital everythîig is done for the wounded in the quickest possible timne, and in the mnost skilful manner, and the proportion of recoveries is proportionately large. 1 ai,, glad that Canada is doing so weIl and is so eager to establisli hospitais. The universities deserve great commendation for the wa 'y they have corne forward to maan the various hospitals with their best teachers, best surgeons and physicians and specialists. Ail honor to, themi and to the Canadian nurses and students who go with them. We are ail sure the work will be well and seientffically done, and refleet credit flot olyv on the British Empire, but on the whole of Canada and its professionial\"rmon and women. May God go with them and prosper them ! SOME OF THE TROUBLES 0F A RURAL MEDL4JAL OFF'ICER 0F HEALTH: AND THEIR REMEDY.* BY MÀwrniT ?owaas, B.A., M.D. Rockiaad. Ontario. W E Medical Officers of I{ealth, in our duties iu the preventioni or elimination of communicable disease are brought into conltact with either urban or rural conimunities. The former 1 eall the urban, the latter the rural officer,, and really and truly theý path of the former as eompared with the latter is strewn with rose, and this T will try t. briefly elucidate or explain. Up to a certain point we, both urban and rural, are on the saie level, in that we ail have had the advantages of the samne preiiua meical education, ouir positions are permanent and our salaries rea. sonable, by law, and thence our paths diverge. For instancee, the urbaji lias special, officers detailed to do bis plaearding and disinifcetixig for him, whÎlst the rural must usually do this work himself. The urban bas milk inspection, a properly proteeted mnilk supply. and modified xnilk depots in the torrid summer mouths; the rural no milk inspection, where eaeh one 's dairy is in his own or his iieighu\u003eor's backyard. The urban lias adequate and up-to-date seweragc systemsi; the rural the ordinary outdoor toilet or the antiquatedl cesspool, w1Ier *Paper rend at the Ontario Health Offigera' Association annual meeting in Peterboro, Ont., May 26the 1915.",
         "ORIGINAL VONTIIIBUIrIONS. Lci owner is as apt~ as not to pass the overflow on to his neighbor's lot the public thoroughfare, whichever proves the handliest. The urban has a pure water system or at least a protectedl stippi ' hiiet the rural has the ordinary weli, or if lie buek cv eniolgil to hav1e1 water systemt hs source of supply, otherwise pure, is 11sualîy po1h1uîe( *contaminated by sewerage from higlier up the stream. The nrbaii ws bis isolation hospitals, with their staff of trained nurses, wiilst thef iral bas no hospitals at ail and rarely secs a trainetd nurse except in s private practice. la short, the urban officer who is on the aiert ail the lînie is at tIll *\u0026d of a well-trained army, where every avenue of inspection or con- gion is adequately protccted against the avent of diesor if por ance disease shoul denter he has tie proper inians rayandl al his $tant disposai to prevent its spread and properiv cope witîx II. lierces the rural officer is the whole army himiself, is not. ai is flot lied upon te be on the qui vive ail the tirne; intruth, his workbeis .ly where an epidemie threatens, and tien he has to hastiiy improvise 3 defences; in fact, his i the work in the trenches, not speetacfflar, ther strenueus. but gives surprisingly good resulta sooner or later, pecially as lie lias as bis allies fresh air and sunlight, natur'e own oDtection against disease. V ve stated this much te prove or ratier 0,w te yon that since the means at our disposaI, i.. the tools we are work witb, are se widely différent, it must necessarily follow that the lution. or solutions of the indîidual problemn niust lie aise entireiy Yerent and the remedy 1 suggest for this is that at this ouir annuaî aference a special section or session bie set \"side for the rural officcra diseuss probiems whose solution may cencern themselves and them.- ves alone, with the one provise, that sufficient spaee of time, ray Lie Imd so as net to seriousiy interfère with the generai scope, of ti etig or assemblage. This brings me to the consideration of our actuai troubles, and the it and feremeet may not, -and net unrarely dees, cerne f rom the at - ,ding physician upon whose active assistance and net his pass;ive% iitac we mue onfidently and mainly rely if we %wishj to have env ,eess in our work, especially in trying to eut short an epidjetnie. We p'e bis ative assistance when lie reporte promptly ana definitely that lies sucli and sucli a communicable disease under bis care. In fart, oftentimes helps us very mucli by actually quarantining the cas(- .ore our arrival. On the Cther hand, we have hie passive resistance en lie mnay net report at ail, or if lie should, he does se tardily, ai, st reluctantlY, saying that he has sucb and sncb a case uxi\u003cer hie ,e that he lias aliglit suspicions that it may or may net be centagiolus,",
         "Ta£ CANADA LANCE.. perhaps dipbtheria probably touailhitîs, scarletina, hybrid iweaaIes, typhoid, a branch of fever, smailpox, chickenpox, or pustular eczema, and so on, although in bis owu heart or seul lie knows, or rathetr shouil know, as well as we that the ca s1 actually diphtheria, scaricinia, typhoid, or smallpox, as the cas rnay be. H1e who acts thus kiiows fili well the reluctance of the average family te be quarantined, wbieh the.y iunfortunately very wrongly consider a disgrace, and relieves hirnisef of ail personal responiîbility or blame in the matter by leaving the, onius of actual and definite diagnosis te the Medical Officer, who then, gets ail the blamee witli its attendant troubles. 0f course, in this category 1 do not include cases whose diagnosis rnay be somewhat obscure or uncertaixi, but 1 amn aiming at the physician who shows snob a lack of sympathy with un and our work that he fandn it ever eonvenient to be consistently uncertain in bis diagnosis when it cornes te a question of communicable disease. For such a Mtate of affairs 'l have no remedy, we muet grin and bear it snd things will right themn. selves in the end. But there in more than this at which we must grin and also bear, 1 bere refer to the highly munificent salaries nome of un recoure am medical ofIcers. A brief histery ef how 1 came to receive $10 per annum and hew Iv'ie had it recently increased te, $100 may prove net untinter- esting reading, and what; in more, may enlighten you on sme of my troubles and how 1 managed to surmount them. IVve practised fiften years in the same tewn of Rockland and eleven years ef this I 'ie beoxi medical officer, snd during this time I 'ie been appointed thrice uand dismnised twice, each time following an epidemic of amalîpox, when, quite naturally, extra money had te be spent in suppressing it, and mark this well, 1 held my position under the old regime for six con- seutive years witbout sny trouble ef any kind untîl amailpox came along in 1911. The tax rate went up, and 1, along witb the whole local Board of Health, received our congé, se that in the final analysisi it seems te me that our troubles have enigin, l it being a matter ef dol- lars and cents te the cemmunity, and under the eld regimê they sougiit efficiency net se much as economy in dealing with healtb mattene, which under tbe new regixué bas been happily cbanged, since our positions were made permanent by tbe Provincial Board seeing te, it that we are efficient, whilst the local council attends te the econemy in many boeaUi- ties by giving unreasonable salaries te their medical efficere., Wbat persecution I had te endure during 1911 made my heart sor, snd xnany's the day J tbought the proverbial darkened eloud had lest its silver lining. Firat and foremoat the general public was raiaed up against me by a few of their self-appointed leaders, wboeclaimed it wam",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. L smallpox at ail. 1 got over this by bringing in a specialist, who ,wed them that my diagnosis was correit. They theii objeited that disease was so, mild and only iii children that no precautions should taken. My a.nswer was that from the mildest case the most virulent 1lit develop, and that aduits were flot immune. Tîme vindicated me -, liter on, aduits were attacked and some of these were of the virolent ifloent type so hideoos to look upon in the pustular stage. And these Lividuals are now, sad to say, the living relies and constant remnindera fools rushing in where angels fear to tread. Quarantining those ,osed was another target for my opponents, and try liow 1 might 1 fld not seem to be able to drill it into their heade that a certain fluli ' of days were required after exposure for the disease to develop, but en smsllpox appeared amongst the quarantined they let up in their dlade. Vaccination was tabooed, and they would have none of it, and ini s they were encouraged by the advices so often given in some newu- .:ers whose edîtors, otherwise highly intelligent, are constantîy on the, rt with an energy worthy of a better cause to rail against any and gorts of vaccination, and ahl 1 have to gay to them in this connection to utudy more deeply and thoroughly, for as Pope gays, - A littie rning is a dangerous thing,\" and wiII add, may the Lord forgive ým for they know flot what harin they do and they would have it, ýught home to them more succinctly and uOnderstand it mucb better lhey eould see, as'I have often Seeniii a smahlpox epidemic, how the euse upreads like widfire amougst the household unvaccinated, leav- *the. vaccinated unscathed. But what eapped the climax of my troubles in 1911 waz the. estab- [ment by our local Board of an Isolation Hospital, which I did then 1 do stili consider an ideal system in cutting short an epidemic, but public in general eonsidered it an absolutely foolisb and unnucs y expense and did flot hesitate to tell us se ini no unmeasured terma. Public opinion, as I have shown, was strong againat us, and our Lneil, to be popular, were aise against us and tried by devions moins 5ircumvent us, but ail to, no avait, as they found we were within the. , in every move we made. Their principal and final onslaught wua ir very determined effort to remove from Us Our money supply; ini j also thcy failed. They then kept quiet, but only for a time. One y easy solution of the question fromn their standpoint would have n my summary removal from office, which the, then law could not ,e prevented, but luckily for me they neyer thought of it. 'Witb sucli opposition to the local health authorities frein thie gen. 1 public and municipal councîl, it waa flot very surpriaing te find",
         "TEE CANADA LANOWM. that many of the infected families thought they were doing whiat wasi just and proper in concealing their cases, and in this they were oftet, abetted even by their neighbors tI some tiinorous soul more fearful of infection than the rest would give the alarm, but usually rather late' to prevent its spread. But more of this anon. Finally, thanks to the brilliant efforts of the then local Board of H-ealth, without whose eourageous assistance 1 would have been prac- tically heipleas, our epidemic came to a speedy and successful termina- tion. For this we received no thanks; only abuse and opprobiumn were headped upon us by those who should have known better for ont so- eailed heinous crime of so foolishly spending the people 's money with the very natural resuit that at the next election, when smallpox was the issue, a concil was chosen whose majority saw to it that we were speedily relieved of our positions and as far as they were concerne(] we went down to oblivion, \"unwept, unhonored and unsung.\"1 However, 1 was net mortally wounded. 1 was only struck below the beit. my oppoli- *.nts had won on a foui, and I'm alive and weIl to-day to tell the tale. As xny successer they chose a very estimable and clever practitioner, whe died wîtha few months. Two other attempts were made to fll the position; both proved abortive. The office was again vacant, s0. our couuncil now knowing that the position would be permanent, deeided after mature consideration to re-appeint me, even in the face of the most strenueus Opposition. My re-appointment at this juncture 1 con- sidered a vîndicationof my conduct as medical officer in niy previous years, and ever look back 'upon it as one of the brightest and happis moments of my meical career. But now 1 give yeu ail a gentie warn- ing who consider yourselves smure and immune from trouble as medjeal officers that you will flnd as councils change that though your frienda in the natural course of events miust find time to shimber, stili your enefies neyer seem to do the Rip Van Winkle stunt, but are wide awake and on the job iail the time, for in niy cas they get back at me by naming as a reasonable salary $10 per annum, and notwithstanding my most earnest endleavors te show them the errer of their ways thety re- peated the dose ini 1914. The only glimmer of satisfaction that I could get from theni during ail this time was that if 1 were flot satialied I could resign and that they had another medical man ready te take the position at even a lower salary. This latter statement was ail too true, So my answer was that 1 was not in the resigning business, but intended te do my work as faithfully and efflciently in the future as 1 had doue in the past, ne matter what the salary, and 1 kept my word, During these two, years my work consisted mainly in dealing with ,sporadie cases of sinalipox, which bas been practicallyv epideiin Our",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. îoeality since our epidernie of 1911, due mostly to the conceahnent of cases by infected fainilies in our population so large]y uinprotected through lack of vaccination. This was brought homîe te -us miost vividly early in thic present year when I received a complaint froni a most authoritice source that the town ceunsellor, niy înost inveterate opponent, who had been the prime mover in fiuing iny salary at $10 per year, was concealing smailpoi. HIe Wa8 running a grocery store in\u003e ennection With hie residence, se 1 knew it meant an epidemie if my information preved correct, And] true it was, for though he had at first denied it, he finally aeknowledgted, when the local Board brought pressure to bear on hlm,. that he had had chickenpox in bis household and that the famnilles of his son and son. in-law, the latter a butcher, had it as well, and our epidemie was el, gloriouuly, for ail this chiekeupox was true emailpox. Energetie pre- cautions were at once instituted, but rather late, as seine of the es tomers of this grocery store and butcher shop were already infected, and through them, their relations. The infection of over a dozen families comprising fifty cases, with a total coat of one thousand dollars. wam the 8um total due to the concealment o! this one case of so-called chieken- pox. This euncillor had xnighty littie respect for the local board tilt it was so forcibly brought to him, and bia son had tess, for lie broke quarantine. For this our remedy was his speedy arrest and a heavy fine, which worked like a charm, for we found that public opinion froem that moment turned in our favor and ever since then we have lad prae- tieally ne trouble. Just at this juncture our municipal council asaembled te decide my Waary for the present year. A motion was made that it be increased te *ioo. Objection was at once made by my consistent epponent, wïio, a.2ong with my variloid friend, has made my life as medical offleer se mliserable during the laut few yeors. Hlis objection was that 1 wua waking toe much fuss about this disease, which he theuglit was nlot uialipex at ail, while e-ven if it were smallpox it was flot contagions be- janse the people did net die from it. However, even he relented some- wbat when he saw that the public through their council wanted to treat ru reasonably, but made a last and final effort te stil keep me under by making an axuendment te give me $50, which was lest, and the motion making my salary $100 carried. This la by ne means an adequate salary, but 1 accept it as an emen ef goed will on the part of our ceuncil wbo this year are really trying te do what îa right by me. And 1 arrived at tbis happy termination of my strenueus troubles of the lust few years b\u003ey bearing no spite or malice te even the bitterest of my epponents and by practically waiting fer better days. In the meantime 1 attended",
         "THE CANADA LÂNCOUT. faithfully and efficiently to aIl my work, as I understood it. and as so ably direeted by our ever ready and always courteous chief officer, 'Mr. McCullough, and his very able and painstaking assistant in our district, Dr. Moloney, to both of whom 1 tender by most sincere thanks for se mucli of my succees during this moat strenueus perîod of inY career as medical officer. But a reasonable salary and just treatmnent one year do flot neces- sarily mean the saine the year following, for ceuncils change and the newly chosen members who, like seme o1: the old ,may be ever zealous at lowering expense, which is at ail times a very popular move, are just as apt as nlot to commence their economie campaigu by curtailing the emoluments of the luckless medical offleer. This is no idie dream, but actually does happen, and one remedy for this would be for those in authnrity to decide upon what constitutes a fair and reasonable mnini- mum salary, or otherwise arrange it in any manner that their mature judgment would consider proper so that we offleers could flot impose upon our eouncils or they upon us, whÎch happens in more than isolated instances. And now, in conclusion, if we take a broader view of the source of ail our troubles we would flnd that it really and actually con- sists in the false impression the general publie have of preventitive medicine in gencral, and especially of its exponents, the medical officers, in particular, who are looked upon in many instances as an infernal bother and unnecessary bill of expense to be got rid of at ai hazarda. Whereas if they would only look upon us in the proper light they would soon see that we are actually working not enly against our own best intereats from a fnancial standpoînt, but rather in favor of the whole community, for if we could succeed as we wish te do in keeping ail the people well, there would be ne doctors' bîis to, pay and enferced idienes through illness wouid vanish, thus adding to, the wealth and prosperity of the country at large. We, in short, are the pioïneers who are blzig the trail for the physician of the future whose duty 'twill be te keep the people well, flot te cure them when they are iîl, and 1 wÎll add, ail pioneers must suifer. 1 This forming and moulding of publie opinion ia te my nund the best solution, and I know of no better means of attaining thia happy end then by constant and progressive study to, s0 impreve ourselves that even the most obtuse will be forced te admire us in our contimued efforts for the public weal. Then with the public confidence wiii eoine their active ce-eperatien, and that la what is mest needed te make ont' work of practical and iasting vaine. As a means te this end we should ahl aim at becoming specialiats in our chosen line by havîng ambition enough te at least aspire te beiwR",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. Sproud possessor of the titie of Diploma of Public Health. The in- itive to those arnongst you who, have the time and the wherewithal to Le sucli a course may yet corne fromn the county councils who, singly collectively, may yet see their way clear and wifl, 1 think, find it ,ney well expended to have and to hold in their midst the bolder of ,h a titie, whose duty would be to give constant advice and timnely istance to, the local officers, until the tirne when the Provincial Legis- ure wiUl i tis wisdom find it convenient to, so incresse its staff of trict health officers as to have the number sufficient to sover the oie Province, which will be the logical and inost satisfactory ending ail Our troubles. THE OCULAR MAN-1IFE STATIONS 0F DISSEMINÂTED SCLEROSIS, WITH REPORT 0F A CASE.- Bv Couim CÂ\u0026mBEL, M.D, Toronto. 1ERHAPS no disease is more frequently missed, in its early stages at least, than the 'disease known variously as disaeininated multiple insular scierosi. The classical symptorns: intentional tremor, mystagmusand seau- ig speech, are by no means always present, and in a large percentage may be absent throughout. It is te this greup particularly that ljcjasD look to, the oculist for aid in iagnosis, and it bas been stated, that \"the most frequent prodroma, symptoms of an incipient crotic change throughout the central nervous systema is somne trausient turbaxice of vision\" The following case was instructive: The patient, s yeung womau, ted that ahe had been thrown to the ground while alighting from s Bet car ifive weeks previously. She was shaken up, \"bhurt generally, - she was not unconscious, mercly numbed, and thinks ber brain was t. Has stammercd ever since. las attacks of dizziness msking her L. Her left eye was turned iu at tirnes since tbe accident and ah. mot see se well with it. A few days after the accident she b.d the dfortune to fall downstairs and following this bad a period of de- uln witb hallucinations of sight, seeng wild animal., etc. My notes sitate that lier speech was slow and besitating. There wus tisl paralysie of the left exterual rectuis, cauising convergent squint ten degreEs. Conjugate movement te the lcft wss defective ini botli à, but the left eye turned in excessively. Couvrgence was defeCtive, * Ronad at the Ontario Medical Assoeiation, Peterboro, May 27th, 1915.",
         "TBI CINADA LLNCETr. failing at seven inches, and it was the left eye whÎch then diverged. Pupils were normal in size, equal and active, but the left alone was not so, quiek to respond, and did not maintain contraction so well as the right. Vision of R. E. 'with correction was 6/6, of 1. E. hand muove- ments. Both dises had their inargins everywhere obscured hy a verv low pale smelling extending somewhat into the retina. It resemnbled the last stage of a subsiding optic neuritis. Vessels were normnal, as were other parts of both fundi. The fields showed slight irregular con- centrie contraction, and the riglit had a sector defect on the lower nasal suadrant. The left eye was color blind to 10 in.m., red and green, and to ail colora with 5 m.m. objecta. Three weeks later there wvas no appreciable change in vision or muscles. The fields were slightly smaller, Three nionths later the eyes were parallel, the left even divergent at timea. The right dise 's outer margin was discernable. The left vision had iinproved to the recognition of large letters (half-inch type at eighteen inches). The left pupil was slightly the larger. Fields could flot be obtained. Dr. Goldwin Rowland has kindly supplied me with his notes on her general condition. Hie found marked tremor of face and legs and coarse tremor of hands, but no intentional tremor. There waa partial semi-anoethesa to aIl sensations over the left aide, lier mental condi- tion was peculiar, and she bail marked las of memory, which could, however, be stimulated. Reflexes were esual and but slightly inereasedI, and organie evidencea were entirely absent. Wassermann in the blood was negative. A diagnosis of insular selerosis seems best to explain the contraâie- tory features of this case. The onset of symptoms after an accident or shock has been noted by authorities (2) and renders the diagnosis from traumatie hysteria diffienît. The defective memory and slow, slurring speech were suggestive, but the reflexea were of negative value and the hemi-anoestheeia of doubtful import. Reliance bad te be placed on the ocular lindinga. The pupils, as is usual, were equal and active. Paralysis of oscular muscles occurs in about twenty per cent. (3); affects the sixth nerve more often than the third, is usually partial and shows its central oengin by frequently involving eonjugate movements and convergence. Contradictions occur which only lesions of association fibres can explain. This is well sbown ini the present case by the paretie Ieft ex-. ternal rectus acting better in conjugate movemnent to, the left than the âound internai rectus of the right oye. Aloo when convergence fasiîed at seven inches it was the Ieft eye with paretie external rectus whieh",
         "ORIGINAL CONTRIBUTIONS. erged. The disappearance of the squint alter a fewv weeks without orovement of associate movement is noteworthy. Changes in the dises are seen in about fifty per cent. of ail cases Total atrophy probably neyer oceurs and recovery of vision la ,n remarkable even in the presence of marked pallor. The plaques in this disease destroy the medullary sheaths, but spae axis cylinders to a considerable degree. When we recail that the Le nerves are strictly flot nerves, but a systein of neurous, stili part 1he central system, and knowing the predeliction of this diease, for white matter, we can understand the frequeney with which they are eted. The transexit amblyopias and pareses in acuete cases are ex- ined by Foster Kennedy (1) on the hypothesis of an aente inter- ive oedema set alight by toxins. Optic neuritis was observed in five of Uhthoff's hundred cases (4), ~zard (5) in one hundred cases neyer saw a true optic neuritis, but grey diseoloration somewhat resembling hyperSînic grey matter.\" ien Russell reinarks that this rare appearance no doubt dependa on a ýh in the nerve at the dise. Nettleship (6) has described a mae of chronlie optie neuritis in dlis- inated selerosis as follows: \"The dises were slightly pale and( iaty )ver, the deep tissue being opaque snd ohseuring the lamina eribrosa the borders being nowhere quite clear.\"1 This description would .or our cas. The appearanees were hard to explain without assurai- an antecedant optie neuritis, but there were no changse in the ves- to indicate activity. Risien Russell lays stress on the unequal effeets on the lielda and )n in the two eyes, and the lack of relation these bear to appearanees ibited by the- dises. E. W. Taylor speaks o! the irreularity o! the ,entric contraction shown in the fields. All suthorities speak of tie [uency of central scotoma of the retrobulbar type, either slighit, and clors only, or total, and usually unilateral. Uhthoff found central orna in fifteen out of tyenty-fonr cases. The seetor defect in one field, with central defect involving eolors 2e other, is very eharacteristie. Kennedy (7) has reeently described mptom complet peculiar to tumors of the lower pants of the frontal ,in whieh central scotoma of thxe retrobulbar type in oane eye acconm- ies choked dise in the other. Jiere, however, the dise pietures were 1 regret that o'wing to legal entanglemnents I was unable to follow the case, but Dr. I{owland bas furnished me with the following s:Eight montha after the accident conditions rexnained much the ~except that marked mental depreciation ocnurred. At thia pericad",
         "Tas CANADA L\u0026NCEf. occurred a recurrence of a knee artitritis and sorne fluid appeaed in the joint. There was slight partial wasting of the lef t deltoid. The re- flexes were but slightly increased and there was still no evidence thereby of organic invoIvenent. A year after the accident lier eyes appeared to be in the saine condition as before. Uer mental condition was much improved, but mcmory was stili very faulty. REF'ERENCES. 1. Kennedy, Poster, Jour. Amn. Med. Aseu., Dec. 5, 1014. 2. Russell, J. 8. Riaien, Albutts' Systern, Vol. vii., p.p. 809-852, 3. Taylor, E. W., in Posey and Spiller. p.p. 469-474. 4. Uhthoff, Arch. f ur Payeh., Berlin, 1890, xxi. 303, v., Buzzard in B. Mr. y,, 1893, il., 779. 4. Nettleship, T. 0. B., Vol Wi., 227. 7. Kennedy, Poster, Amn. Jour. Med. Se., Sept., 1911, No. 3, Vol. c.xiii, p. 355. DIABETES AND SURGERY. E. H. Risley (Boston Medical Sug. Journal) groupa the cases pre- senting titis association into the following categories: \u003c1) Cases in wici glycosuria is eaused by the surgical lesion. (2) Cases in which it causes do not innuence eacit other. (4) Cases in which glycosuria is a harmful factor and adds to the danger of the already present disease or injury. The following rules may be laid down in regard to operations ont dia- beties: A thorough examination of the urine must be made in every case, especially for the detection of acetone and diacetie acid. The total amount of ammonia must always be estimated. No operation except of the extremest emergency should be performed if there is one grain of amînonia exereted in 24 hours, until titis has been reduced to the normal amount, .759 granm. An operation should be postponed should there he acetone or diacetic acid, even if the amount of ammonia is normal. Much aibuinin in the urine is a contra-indication to Operatin and even in smali amounits is of bad prognostie import. Most of the major opera-. tions of surgery have been and cani be performed with suceess on dia- betica. The presence of glycosuria should neyer deter the surgeon front performing any operation of emergency. Other cases should not be operated upon in which acetone, diacetie acid, and ammonia cannot be reduced by preliminary treatment. A mortality of 20 to 30 per cent. is to be expected in titis elass of cases. The use of an anesthetie other than ether and chloroforma, careful dietary treatment before operation, the prevention of sepsis, and rapid technique will stili furtiter reduce the maortality.-Medical Record.",
         "CURRENT MEDICÂL LiITUTtI. M CURRENT MEDICAL LITERATURE HEART DISEASE. The importance of remembering that we are dealing with ani rganismn and flot with a mechanism ini our studies of disease is pointe(] ut by J. 1. France, Baltimore (JO'urnMa.i., Feb. 2o, 1915), andi specially the necessity of appreciating that pathologie procemses inay iiow their first effeets in the nervous systemn. le gives the resuit of atudy of the nervous and mental syyptoxna of eardiar diseasqe, aud resents his tentative conclusions. Head has shown that there are two r'jptoms referable to the nervous system that are quite constant iii %ses of disturbed 'or broken cardiac compensation. First, a refleettdl ain, along tht distribution of the fifth nerve and, secondl, depression, axiety and fear, independent of worry about the dlisease, and with o\u003er ithout distinct delusions and hallucinations. Hua conclusions, go far ; he has been able to give themn fromn Head 's observations and his own. .-e briefly surnmed up as follows: 1. A defective heart valve eausing rdiac 8train or irregularity is sufficient to cause a distinct emotional ýpression and fear, whieh may be unexplained or be attendeij by dis- net delusions or hallucinations. 2. The mental symptomns of candiae zease are apt to, occur when the inhibitions of the higher centres are laxing in the hypnagogic or incipient dreaming state. and there às uch to support the old view that night terrors or nightmnare are often le to disturbed heart action. Ail heart patients should be questioned Dsely about their sleeping and dreaming. 3. There are cases of heart sorder that may be overlooked by the physician by his not studying e nervous system, and the stethoscope may not reveal thtmn. Nocturnal teks of bradycardia may be the only cardiac symptom for a tinie, and e importance of studying the heart action during sleep is evident. 4. ie nervous symptom of certain forme of heart disease are Ruffieientlv stant to be of some practical value. The neuralgia of the flfth nerv e d thec scalp tenderness over its distribution are se frequent as to be diagnostic and prognostic value. In chronie valvular cases it may be constant that the patient himef learns that it indicates a need of it. 5. it às important to remember that in many cases of fifth nerve uralgia and aIse many cases of neursthenia with anxiety. fear anid presion, especially in patients over forty or fifty years of age, May ssibly be due to that condition of nerve strain whieh may bc caused nascent cardiac disorder net yet shown by physieal signa. We are gt beginning to learn the importance of cardiac nerve and muscle -ain in the production of nervous symptorns. Every physician should",
         "TffE CANADA LANCET. make these a study, and take note of tht nervous and mental symptoms of his patients; and every general hospital should have a phychologie laboratory for the investigation of suitable cases. THE SALICYLATES IN RHEUMATIC INFECTION. R. Miller (Lancet) states that the theory that salicylates have tht power of diminish ine the activity of the rheumatic infecting agent may be taken as the working baais of salicylate tberapy in rheumnatism, and the drugs should be administered with the sole view of controlling the bacterial aetivity. 0f this the temperature chart is as aceurate an index in rheumatic as in other infections (e.g. tuberculosis). Care nmust be taken to, discriminate between symptoms directly due to active rheu- matie inflaînmatory processes and those dependent upon toxic parenchy- matous changes which may remain long after ail bacterial. activity is at an end. Used solely with a view to controlling bacterial activity, the effective range of dosage for child or aduit is usually from 60 to 12o grains per diem. Lesu than 1. dramt daily is rarely sufficient; more than 2 drama need seldom be given. Much larger doses than thes\u0026 have been shown to be safe if properly administered, and if necessary to gain corn- trol may be used, but for the most part \"massive\" doses have been administertd in Cases of chorea in which there was no evidence of bac- terial activity remaining. Any dose greater than 100 'grains daily should be given subdivided into 10 doses in the 24 hours. Large infrequent doses should neyer be given, particularly in children. Constipation Inuat be avoided. The sodium salicylate should be combined with an equal dose of sodium bicarbonate. Vomiting in Came of severe cardiac dila- tation may be difficuit or impossible to prevent ,but in other cases may be avoided for the most part. . The more serious symptoms of salicylate poisoning (acid intoxication) should nowadays neyer be allowed to arise. -Medcal Record. FAR.-REACHING EFFECTS 0F LEAD POISONING. \"To one who contemplates the manifold physiologie activities which are called into progress during the perîod of gestation in the female, it is not surprising that damage of any sort, whether it be a physical ixijury or a chemical intoxication, may bring untoward consequences to botb the maternai organism and the f etus. The metabolism of the mother is intimately bound up with the nutrition of the Young she bears. The transmission of harn, like the communication of disease,\" sava The",
         "CUREENT MEDICAL L[TERATURE. ,rmil of the Arnerican Medical Association, \"lfoilows as a more or leus vious consequence of the intimate connection between the female and r developing offspring. ,Defeetive conditions may accordingly affect embryo îndependentiy of any pureiy hereditary factor. They are, to speak, the resuit of a detrimental uterine environinent. 'The possibilîty of harm transmitted through the medium of the maie flot equally obvions. The germ ceil of the maie is, of course, the -rier of conspicuous hereditary qualities which manifest themnseives umistakable fashion in the offspring. This îs flot equivalent, bow- -r, to the contention that damage to the maie may deteriorate the germi 1 in a way that expresses itself by defective offspring. Nevertheleaa, Sexperîments of Stockard on guinea-pigs and of Cole and Davis on )bits have indicated that alcohol bas a deleterîous .effect on the germi Ls of the maie. -Lead poisoning in industries in wbicb individuats are exposed to d in its varions forma is reputed to have a detrimentai effe t on the ipring of the workers, whether maie or female. Hlaif a century aRo astantine Paul reported striking observations in tthe efYeeta of paternial d poisoning--cases in which in the course of his work the father waa )jected to plumbism, the mother being unaffeeted. Ife obtained the tory of thirty-two pregnancies of this order; twelve of themi resulted the death of the fetus before term; twenty ehildren were born alive. the mortaiity among them was extremely large, oniy two surviving third year. Children so, born were found particuiarly fiable to vari- nervous affections. These unusuai statisties have not, so far as we avare, been refuted. - In the departinent of experimental breeding at the University of sconsin, Cole and Bachhuber have ciearly shown the effect of lead the germ cela of the maie, in rabbits and fowls, as indicated by their geny. Theîr method invoived the ingenious device of double mating, [eh consists in breeding a female of a certain type to two males of ike type at the same period. In thîs wa'y the maie parentage of the pring can be recognizcd by their distinguishing characters One male treated with iead, the other remained free f rom intoxication. It is iecessary to quote here the actuai Statiztics of these breeding trials. \u003ey lead to the conviction that the young produced by maie rabbit8 ich have been poisoned by ingestion of Iead acetate have a lover khity and are distinctiy smalier in average si7e than normai offspring inpoisoned maies. In fowis likewise the poisoning of the maie parent h lead results ini ofspring of a distinctly lover average vitality. IlThe outeome of these investigations furnishes food for reflection. kd poisoning and the opportunîtieg for it are by no means raritieg.",
         "TUB CANÀDA LANCIZT. There are more than a hundred occupations ini which industrial Iead poisoning înay more or less readity occur, and the cases of known intoxi- cation from. such sources reach into the liundreds in some of the larger cities. Plumbism may appear under mose peculiar clinical guises and with most unexpected histories. These newly recognized featuires of the. effects tranamitted to a second generation complicate its mianifestations more than ever.\" INDIRECT TRANSFUSION 0F BLOOD. Mom (Amer. Joitrial of -eiu Science, 'May, 1914) dlescribes a simple method for the indirect transfusion of blood w-hich he lias uised mn about 75 cases. Its advantages over the direct miethod are thiat it is casier tn perform and the amtount of blond transfused is undler abso. lute control and eau be xneasuired exactly. Only in exceptional cases- as in very amati children, where it is necessary to expose a vse.i any sear left, and the vessels are not obliterated. The f act that defibrinated instead of whole blood isi used does not appear to be de(tri-. mnental, as the body eau apparently withstand the injetion of large amouints of fibrin ferment without harm, aud in no instance hans there been intaravascular clotting after the introduction of defibrinated blood. Followîng the transfusion of 5W0 c.cm. the blood counit gainedi betweeu 1 and 2 million ceils, and no instance of blood destruction m'ab, observedj where homologous blood was used, the donor and donee belonging to the. same group, as determined by the iso-agglutination niethod. E xcept in those patients whose blood is deficient in fibrinogen, sucli indirect trans-. fusion of defibrinated blood accomplishes as much for the patient as; the more ifficuit direct transfusion of whole blood. The method eonsists of two parts: (1) Obtaining blood from, the donor by ineans of an~ aspirating apparatus, and its defibrination by shaking iu fiasks w-ith glass beads; and (2) the intravenous introduction of the deflbrinated blood into the patient. Five Erlenmeyer flasks each of 300 c!.em. capa- city, 2 oz. of glass beads, one infusion bottie, two infusion nepedles, 121/, ft. of rubber tubing, 18 iu. of glass tubing, one thumbscrew, one rubiier stopper with two holes, and four plain rubber stoppera constitute the. apparatus required. For the aspirating outflt two pieces of glass tubing, 4 ln. long, are bent at the mîddle at right angles, one end of each beiuqg passed througil the holes lu the rubber stopper, whîle to the free eud of one an infusion needie, about 11/ inl. long aud of fairly large calibre, is attached by means of a short rubber connexion, the. free end of the other being fltted with 6 lu. of rubber tubing, with glaus tubiug for a mouthpîece. ilf an ounce of glass beads is placed lu caeh of four of",
         "PEESONAL AND NEWS TMS. e Erlenaieyer flasks, which are stoppered with cottonwool. F'or the troduetion of the defibrinated blood a amall infusion needie isý- attached the infusion bottie by 12 ft. of rubber tubing interruptedl hyN two glaaa nnulae, the thuinbscrew being placed on the tuhing near the needie. i. four flasks eontaining the beads are sterilîzed by dry heat, and the inainder of the apparatus by boiing. The rubber stopper earrying the edie la fitted into the empty Erleneyer fiask, and a littIe mnaltedl ,raffin, which bas been heated to 200 C., le aspîrated throughi thle edie int the flask, air being continnously aspiratedi until the paraliu lidilBes on the inner walls of the needie and tubîng. The stop)per is en fitted into one of the fiasks eontaîning beada, and under asepie pre. ations tbe needie je intriduced into a vein, and about 200 c.c4. of bloodl pirated. Without disturbing the needie another flaak iesubîîtd c lirst one being closed with a sterile rubber stopper and shaken vigor- uly by an assistant for ten minutes to defibrinate the blood, a seconti d third flask being treated in th1e same wvay, 600 C.Cm1. yielding .500 nm. of deflbrinated blood. Sterile normal sait solution la dieu run rough the infusion bottie, tubing, and needie, and the thtitbscre-w ,sed when only a few c.em. remain ln the hottie, over the inouth ef [ieb four layers of sterile gauze are plaeed lu th1e forin of a ftunnel- iped depdession, through whieh the deflbrînated blood la poured froin ,Erleunmeyer flasks. The needie having been lnserted into a velu antI bottie elevated, the sait solution in the tuhlng andf th. defibrinated Od la allowed to rn in mb the patient 's arm, the tubing havlng been led in a vessel of water at 38 degree C., in order that the bleod niaX ;er the patient at body temperature.-Britisk eia Jousrnal. PERSONAL AND NEWS ITEMS Dr. A, Jacobi was recently the guest at a dinner given lu honer of 85th birthday by a ifumber of physicians aI the Hotel Astor, New Dr. O)tto V. Huffman, secretary of the Newv York State Board of dical Exanxlners, bas been elected secretary of the faculty and execu-~ ofefilcer of Long Island College Hospital, BrooklYn, as'fueceeor to Joseph 11. Raymond. It ie announced that Columbia University is going te buliild one of largest medlical achools ln the world on a part of the site whl.h was oierly the Anierican League basebali gronnd aet 165th Street amti ,adway-",
         "TUE CANADA LANOE. The new buildings of the Washington UJniversity Medical School. St. Louis, were deicated with appropriate exercises on April 29th and 3Oth. Addresses were made by the dean of the sehool, Dr. Eugene L. Opie, and President Lowell. of Harvard; Mr. H1. S. Pritchett and Dr. Abraham Flexner, of the Carnegie Foundation; Dr. Weîch, of Johns Hopkins; Surgeon-General Gorgas, Drs. George Dock, R. J. Perry and William T. Porter. The King Edward Hlospital Fund recently held its annual mieet- ing. The reports were of a most satisfactory character. The total reeeipts for 1914 were £529,885, of which more than £315,000 were con-. tributed for capital, and £214.000 for general aceount. Since the fou,,- dation of the fund a total of £1,950,416 have becit distributed to the varions hospitals, convalescent homes and sanatoria. Dr. Richard P. Strong, head of the American Red Cross Commiis- sion sent to Serbia, has asked for at least 175 additional doctors and fourth-year students to aid in controlling the typhus fever epidemie. There is great need for hospital supplies. The Belgian Relief Cornmittee reports the distribution of nearly $50,000,000 worth of food and clothing. The inedical profession of Regina tendered a banquet to Drs. Dakin and Field on the occasion of their leaving for service in the Royal Armny Medical Corps. Madame Depage, wife of Dr. Antoine Depage, surgeon to King AI. bert of Belgium, was drowned in the Lusitania disaster. She was in America collecing funds for the Red Cross work. She had *100l.000 with lier in the ship s safe, whidh was lost. The National Association of the United States for the Study and Prevention of Tubereulosis is putting forth an effort to induce doctors, nurses and medical colleges to pay more attention to the study of the prevention of this disease, and give special instructions. Recently M. Wernberg, of the Pasteur Institute, has iso1ated a bacilhis whieh causes gaseous gangrene. A serum lias been obtained that promises good resuits. At this time when the publie mÎnd is so full of weighty coneerns, one would, think that Mr. Stephen Coleridge could fLnd somnething bet- ter to, spend Mis energy upon than in an attaek upon Sir Almnroth Wright, who has done s0 mudli ini the way of perfecting vaccination agaiqst typhoid fever. This method of preventive treatment is too well estaib- lished to be affected by any sudh diatribes as appeared in the, London Tims. On 30th April Sir Alexander R. Simpson, emeritus professor of gynmeology and obstetrica, University of Edinburgh, eompleted hix, 8Oth year.",
         "PEESONÂL AND NEWS IEmS. Mr. G. L. Cheatie, Sir W. Cheyne, Bart., Mr. Raymond Johnson, W. M.ýacEwen, Dr. H. D. Rolleston, and Mr. G. R. Turner are re. ed for adviee by the Admiralty, and are paid a retaier of £5,01X) car. Sir Wilmot lleringham will be remernbered for his 'v1sit to Toronto e years ago, when hie read a paper on renal disease. lIeÉ lias en ,hted since, and quite recently had a son killed in the war. Mr. Arthur W. Corwin, F.R.C.S., eonsulting, surgeon to, the Central don Throat and Ear Hospital, Ieft an estate valued at £91,000. lie instructions that special care was to be taken that hie was ripally 1 before his body was cremated. Sir William Richard Gowers, the noted London physician and rologist, died, on 4th May, at the age of 70, after a long iliness. He ,educated at Christ ýSchool, Oxford, and, when 17 years old, was renticed to a surgeon in Essex. fie obtained his M.R.C.s in 1867, later bis M.D., London University, witli gold medal. le studiedi thand and became so expert in the art that he mnainly sllpported( self by ît. For some time he was private secretary to 'Sir W\\illiami ier, and reported hie lectures, lie became connected with University ege Hospital and the National Hospital for Paralyzed and Epileptie- some time lie was engaged in teaehing students. lie was the. author iany books on the nervous system. is researches on the. examina. of the blood, the fundus of the eye, and the central nervous sYstem -d much to our knowledge in thes subjeets. Dr. E. T. E. Hamilton,*of Johannesburg, died recently as the. re. of ill health eontracted through liis strenuous murgical duties in lectiOn with the troop8 engaged in quelling the South African re- on. Hie was a practitioner of exceptionally high standing and acter. Sir George Turner, M.B., D.P.H., died at his homne in Colyto'n, )n, a few weeks ago, For many years he was a specialist in public thi iatters. lie was connected with the medical departient of the, LI Government Board. Hie waii later on associated wjith Professer i n the investigation of some tropical diseases. lie was sent euit 2e British Government as Medical Officer of liealth for Cape Colony. -etired a few years ago and returned te England. Tiie subject of twilight sleep is now being aired in the lay preual in ain. Somae women in writing contend that it is morally wrong to ve the suffering of eliildbirth, as to do se would b. acting eontrary ie teaehings of Seripture. Pools die hard. The. medical men of Vancouver, through Dr. A. S. Muriro, have ed the personnel of a mnilitary hospital of 1,040 beds.",
         "TUE CÀNA\u0026DA LÂNOUT. *Dr. W. M. Hart, superintendent of the Sanatorium for Consuimp- tives at Qu'Appelle, Sask., and who went with the Fifth Bataillîon, is a prisoner. Major T. B. Richardison has been plaeed in charge of the hosrjtai at the Exhibition Camp. Dr. David Smith, of Stratford, is in charge of the hospital of the. 33rd and 34th Batallions, at London concentration camp. Bangour Asylum, in Seotland, has been emptied of its patients by distributing them among other institutions. It is -fitted up as a military hospital, and will be capable of receiving 1,350 wounded and sick sol- diers. The fourtieth annual meeting of the aluniî of medical departmient of Buffalo University, was held on 5th June. There are about 1,800\u003e graduates scattered i ail parts of the world. At the National Conference on Charities it was stated that there\u003c were 200,000 feeble-minded persons in the United States. On a recent date the funds in connection with thxe war stood a\u0026. follow;: Belgian Fund, $1,295,818; Ried Cross, $628,492; American Amnbulance, $388,743; Polish Fund, $1 23,687; and Serbian Fund, $94,. 93f1. A bill las passed the Iluse of Representatives o! the Massachusetts, GenieralCourt providing that no one shall be admitted to the State te. praetise who has not graduated f rom a college with power to grant a medical degree. Dr. H. L. Fisher, of Washington, and Dr. F. W. P'earl, of New York, on their way to join the Red Cross; Dr. J. T. Hougliton, o! Troy;- Dr. O.'N. Kenan, Washington; Dr. D. V. Moore, o! Yankton, were on board the Lusitania and were ail saved, due to their eoolnesu and pres ente o! mînd. The Osiris prize, about $20,000), is awardedl every three years for the best work on original diseovery. Lt is under the control of the. French Institute, and was bestowed this year equally on Dris. Chante. messe, Widal and Vineent. The Legisiature of Nebraska lias appropriated $150,000 for the, erection o! a teachîng hospital in Omaha in connection with the Medical College. The antivivisectionise lose li Pennsylvanîa. They attempted to defeat the bill permitting ail unclaimed animais in the pound to b. ueed for scientifie purposes, but were voted down. The inedical colleges li Russia have been elosed for the. present têo enable ail doctors and students to attend the sick and wounded soldierg. The medicai men o! Britain, Canada and the 'United States have.",
         "PERSONAL AND NEWS ITEM. Psponded well to the eall of Serbia for help. Already a numiber of ospital uits are ai work in that country with efficient mneans of fight- ig typhus, smallpox and other infections. Dr. J. G. Adami has been appointei inedical historical recorder or i. Canadian Expeditionary Force. Re is eminenltly fitteti for the mties of sucli a post. Dr. H. A. Boyce, for seven years medical superintendent of the \",ngston General Hlospital, has gone iet general practice in Kingston, rid bas been succeeded in the hospitfil by Dr. Coon, It is proposed to expenti about $125,000 in enlarging St. Josephi's [ospital, Hamilton. Dr. David Townsend, superintendent Jordan -Memorial Sanatorium, iver Glatie, N.B., visits a number of places at regular dates andi givea inies on tuberculosis. The 34th annual meeting cf the Notre Dame Hospital, Montreal. iowed a deficit of $3,500. The members of the executive coninmittee Ibseribeti $4,480, andi gave a credit balance of $978. Dr. George R. Pirie, of Calgary, bau been appointed ssuperintendent the Hospital for Sick Children, Great Ormonde Street, London, Eng- 31d. During the past year 260 patients were treated in the. Red Deer .emorial Hospital. The Provincial Hospital, at Battieford, Sask., ia to b. enlarged by ie addition of a new pavillon. The. St. John 's Ambulance Association of British Columbia has for-. arded to, Britain $470. The offer of the physicians andi surgeons cf Peterboro, Ontario, to an a hospitai for service ini Europe, ineluding Serbia, hais been acept- L. Supplies are bo be raiseti by volunîary effort. The. Freneh-Canadian Siationary Hospital, which is belng recruited Montreal, wÎll be in eommand of Lieut.-Col. Arthur Mignautt. The' ,toxs niaking up the staff will be Drs. E. Peltier, J. R. Boy, F. de artigny, J. A. Lanoie, F. Parisian, C.S.Pierre andi R. Laurier, The lîkely officers cf the Ontario Bass Hospital will be Drm. R. B. rr, H. J. Hamnilton, H. B. Anderson ani Il. A. Bruce. If they aire epointed they will bie given the rank of lieutenantcoon.j~ The draft cf inedical men ait the disposai cf the War Office lias led comisons lu the R.A.M.C. being given to fourteen ýMeGil graduatos. lt)hough the War Office lias asked Canada to supply doctors hitherto, ,ey have only accepteti licentiates, but this is now waive\u003cL Dr,. Archîbalti Williaxnson, the treasurer of Queen's Stationary",
         "TIM CANADA LÂNCNI. Hospital for Overseas Service, wishes to acknowledge the receipt of $150 from the Women 's Patriotie Auxiliary, Fort William, whieh will, go to the furniahing of six cota in Queen 's Hospital. It is intimated that the Ontario Hlospital for Convalescents will be located at Sandling Camp, England. The rapid reconstruction of part of the Lakeside Hospital for Sick Chidren has mnade it possible to remove 100 chîidren f rom the hospital in Toronto to the one ou the Island for the summer. The old Toronto General Hospital lias been offered as a soldier 's convalescent home. No better use could be made of a portion of the moneY votedl by thep Legialature for war purposes than that decided upon by the Groverii- ment. An Ontario hospital of 1,000 beds in England and haîf a dozenj motor ambulances in France will meet pressing'needs, soften the lot of wounded soldiers, and save the lives of many. The heavy caaualty lists give promise of more to corne and the sooner the hospital is built, equip- ped and in operation the better. No time will be loat by the Govern- ment, which bas already devoted $800,000 to war and relief purposffs, and lias still upwards of $1,000,000 in hand for the new hospital and other projects. The faculty of medicine at Laval University bas bee notified by, the Miliîa Department at Ottawa that the Government will accept an offer of a hospital equîpment and personnel of 1,040 beda. Thirty-two doctors and seventy-five nurses, comprisîng the Chlicago unît for service in the British army, left on l4th June. The doctors% will receive commissions in the Britishi Army Medfical Corps. BOOK REVIEWS FARR'S OIUTLINES 0F INTERNAL MEDICINE FOR NURSES. Outlines of Internal Medicine. For the Use Of Nurses. By Cliff ord Bsaiey Farr, A.M., M.D., Instructor in Medicine, University of Pennsylvanie; Asaistant Visiting Physician, Philadelphia General Hospital; Pathologist te the. Prei)\u003ey- teris.n Hospital. 12mo., 408 pages, illustrated with 71 engraving8 and 5 plates. Cloth, $2.00 net, Philadelphia and New York: Lea \u0026 Febiger, Pub- lishero, 1915. As a basis for a systematic training school course ini internai medb rine or as a referene volume for the graduate nurse, Dr. Farr's work has been most logically planned and perfected with a discriminating grasp of the reqluirements and limitations of a nursing text-book. Rie bas conscientîously avoided the somewhat frequent practice of",
         "BOOK RICVIEW5. rnaking a rudimentary medical work masquerade as a nurse's text-book merely by the insertion of a few general observations on nursing. Con-, llning himself strictly to the consideration of internai miedicine, he pre- sents it with the single purpose of meeting the nurse's needa. ln seleeting bis material, in order to emphasize the practical, lie lias wisély drawn largely on his personal experience in hospitai wvork, aithougli be bas referred frequently to the niost authoritativ-e toit-books for mup~. plementary data. BeJirNvig that ant intelligent grasp of the nature of the various dsaetheir syxnptoms and treatmnent, is essential to the developinent of nursing efficiency, the author has presented every vital fact in detail, but bas limited his consideration to essentials snd bas emiplasized thlose points which will be mose useful to his readers. Hlis work is at once compréhtensive, readily understood and stimnlating to a fuil conception of ail that is eoînprised in the terni \"Interniai -Medicine.\" Tli ur#e wbo conscientiously studies this volume cani liardly fail te acquire a uaew. ful appreciation of the significance of symptonis, of the purpo\"e and technie of treatuient and of the nature and eausation of tlie varieus diseases\u0026 The plan of the work, whîle novel, is most logical, sud from a didac. tic standpoint presents many advantages. It is divided into ten IlPfarts, I eiglit dealing with diseases of tlie various systents and two with lisrmtul agencies (physical, chemical and bsïcte,,rial) invading the body from without. In oach \"Part\" general considerations are first taken up, to b.e followed by sketches of the more important disýeasea, ineludiug briefly their etiology, and in more exteudod detail their characteriatics, symp- toms and prognosis, with frequent suggestions for emergency procedurte. in appropriate sections mucli informnation on dioteties o! special and general value is presented. The sections dealing witli infectious dia- eues are peculiarly useful both fromn the logical groupiug o! topies and the extended consideration of prophylaxis and froin the elear insiglit afforded into serum and vaccine therapy, infection and immuuity, and the application of the principles of immunology in diagnosis, A ulsefuil metin gives in detail the relative frequfoncy o! diseases and their rela- tive moritality. Realizing that an understanding o! technical ternis is o! prime im- portane,~ the author makes no0 effort to avoidi their use, but is at pains% to supply elear delinitions aud explanations. Wlile the. conaideration of every topic is ample and suggests no abridgmeut, the author's pur- poeis plainly to dovolop the student as a well equipped nurse sud flot as an internist.",
         "TUE CIADÂ LA.NCIT. MISCELLANEOUS SANATOGEN. It has been said by some that this preparation is a Germian onle. This is quite incorrect. It is manufactured in Britain, with British labor, and frorn material secured in Britain. The factory is located nlear Pensance, in Cornwall. The site is in a rural district ainong the hilis, in a !nost sanitary situation, and free from sinoke. It is an ideal spot for the manufacture of a food. This location was chosen because it furnishes an ample supply of the best (juality of milk. The water ,supply is also the very best. With regard to the manufacture of Sanatogen the utrnnst care is taken that the very best material is used, and that the actual productioa, of the article is carried on under the most scrupulous care as to every detaïl of skill and cleanliness. The milk mnust be absolutely f reali. ThIle powder is prepared at the factory and shipped in bulk to London, where it is put up in packages and labelled at Chemes Street. The composition of Sanatogen is made known to the public and has been from the inception of the business. The greatest care is taken over every stage of tis manufacture to avoid contamination. Sauatogen is flot a mere mixture, but a delinite chemical compound with dlefinite therapeutic properties. THE LOCAL APPLICATION 0F BOVININE. Our recent knowledge of the effect of blood and blood sertim in reparative processes has resulted in a wide application of its uses. In local processes where repair is sluggish, as in indolent ulcers, the application of blood serum supplies, not only nutrition to tissues which are under nourished, but the stimulating properties which are now known to be inherent in blood serum as well. Blood for this purpose is now available in a practical formn in Bovinine, a preparation of beef blood, in which the biological properties of the blood serum have not been altered by heat. The small amount of alcohol which Bovinine contains, flot ouîy aids in promoting antisepsis when used as a local dressing, but Provides an admirable stimulant to the sluggish tissues. The use of Bovinine as a local dressing in sluggish and indolent ulcers and bed sores, bas yielded successful results in mnany cases wheyre ether well-known methods had proved unsatisfactory and unavailing_",
         "MJEOELLÂNEus. ONTARIO VITAL STATISTICS. The returns issued hy the Provincial Beard of Ilvalth relatinq to the cases and deaths from communicable diseases reported by the locall Board-, of Health for the inonth of May, 1915,-) show Illat casesi az)KI! deaths respectively numbered 1,109 and 126, as compared with 1,434 and 127 in 1914. The following places last mionth reported smallpox: Toronto, London, Stratford, Port Arthur, Haileyrbury, Berliin, Cobalt, Ro\u003cekland, Norwich, South Dumfries, Madoc township, North Watig- ham, Wiudham, Biddulph, Rawdon and Keewatin. The comparative returaki are as follows: 1915 11 Diseases. Cases. Deaths. CJases. I)eat lp. Smnappom ... ... ... .....55 0 3 Scarlet fever ..... ......112 3 275 13j Diphtheria ........191 13 183 10( MNeasies........659 9. 691 21 Whooping cough .........39 5 96 Typhoid fever .... .......24 6 36 ci Tuberculosis ... ........114 ai 110 infantile paralysis . .. 0 0 2 o Cerebro-spinal meningitis 15 9 :3 3 1109 126 1434 127- TIIE ACORN AND THE OAK. The growth of the Sharp \u0026 Dohme drug and phiarmnaceical busi- niess is one of the best proofs to-day before the w\u003erld of good miethodâ and good quality. The business had its real rigin ini 1860 wheu the partnership was formed that has been s0 successful. The firm ha. now large branches in New York, Chicago, New Orleans, St. Loiiis, A.tlanta an\u003ed Philadeiphia. The main department la in Baltimore. The letters S . \u0026 D.11 stand for quality and purity. AMERICAN PUBLIC HEALTH PROBLEMS. The rudfential Insurance Company' of Amierica has issuied a very *teresting and instructive bookiet ont this subjeet. It contaizia a goo\u003ca jeaI of very useful information on bealth affairs, and la well worthy of ,aredul stnidy. A reading of this hooklet wiIl repay well for tii. trouble. PRINCE 0F WALES FUTND. The Prince of Wales Fund has niow reached $26,650,000. ThiÀs la mDly one of many patriotie- funds raised ini Great Britain, but ig thi. ,rcatest apart fromi the Red Cross. So far morne $10,52so ba u e listributcd for the additional relief of familles of soldiers and sailors ýn in cases of civil distress, which have been nrncih le-,- than at one time",
         "THZ CANADA LANCECT. feared. Widows and orphans have corne in for substantial. aid as welI as maimed and blinded soldiers. The administration of the fund bas so far cost a littie over $30,OOM. CHINESE MEDICAL INSTITUTIONS. The Rockefeller Foundation has ernbarked upon a plan of Ameri- canizing the medical education of ail Chinese institutions of learning. Dr. Win. Weleh, pathologie of Johns Hopkins University, acconmpanied hy Dr. Simnon Flexner, Dr. David H. Robinson and Dr. Wallace But- terick, of the Rockefeller Foundation, have arranged to départ for China about June 3Oth to work out the plan. The medical edueation in the sehools already established will be systeinatized, and new sehools will be established. President Frank J. Goodnow, president o! Johns Heop- kins, and consitutional adviser o! the Chinese Republic, will be asso- ciated with tne work. Re is already on bis way to China. GRAND MARCH PAST 0F THE ALLIES AT THE EXHIBITION. The inost brilliant a2nd spectacular episode ever staged before the grand stand wil be the Review of the Troops at Calais and the Grand March o! the Allies. In the former the visitor will see the armnies of France iu the ancient city of Calais. Massed upon the litoral wili be the comumandera of the allied arxnies and the sovereigns of the allied c ountries. Soldiers front Russia, France, Great Britain and ber Do-. minions, Italy, Serbia and Montenegro, dressed in their national uni- forma, will mareh in one great phalanx hefore mien wbo to-day are making history and ehanging the map of the world. Whien this great military aggregation bas passed in review order before kings and generals, a wonderful vista wil open before the eyes o! the people. On the far horizon will be seen the watch-dogs of Great Britain, led by the Iatest super-Dreadnought, the Queen Elizabeth, and followed by twenty-six battleships, battle cruisers, torpedo boats and submarines. In bis flsgship, the Lion, Admiral Sir David Beatty will lead the total fleet before Sir John Jellico, the admirai cornmanding, in bis flagship, the Iron Doke, wbo will review the fleet anidst a salvo, of broadsides. Then at a given signal the whole fleet will be brilliantly illuminated and amidst the strains of \"Old Hundred\" will vanish over the lhorizon. it is going to be Military and Patriotie Year at the Canadian Na- tional Exhibition this year. \"The Marcb Past of the Allies\" will bc, put on witb a tbousand performers and a score of bands."
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Canada lancet"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_05199_539",
      "label" : "Vol. 48, no. 11 (July 1915)",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_05199_539",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_05199"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_05199_539/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.80523/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "creator" : [
         "Roode, C. L. de (Charles Lambert), 1859-1925."
      ],
      "lang" : [
         "fra"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Montréal : Granger Frères, [1916?]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Poèsie.",
         "Titre de l'écran-titre.",
         "\"Deuxième série des Visions de guerre.\"",
         "\"La Marne, Verdun, Ypres, Courcelette.\"",
         "Signé et daté: C.-L. de Roode, Montréal, décembre 1916.",
         "186, [1] p. ; 17 cm."
      ],
